Business Consultant

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Google Sheet : https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/1JZkiPEQlEiEL-vLAa6-bDnGNcd8cxrtyBsCsW-Nyp1k/edit?usp=sharing
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



1. 
Job description

Role Overview

Automate and optimize business processes across sales funnels, marketing reports, and acquisition channels
Perform business analytics and present insights to senior management
Build dashboards and reports using Power BI
Write and optimize SQL queries; support ETL automation using Python
Prepare ad-hoc reports and analytical insights
Track, develop, and improve business KPIs (Retention, Conversion, Cost per Loan, etc.)
Requirements

Graduate in technical / mathematics-related discipline
Strong interest in business analytics and technical skill development
Advanced SQL knowledge
Good understanding of databases / data warehouses
Strong analytical, reporting, and Excel skills
Fluent in English
Good to Have

Experience with Power BI and Python
Exposure to CRM campaigns and communication strategies
Understanding of lending / financial services domain


Role: Data Science & Analytics - Other
Industry Type: NBFC
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Data Science & Analytics - Other
Education
UG: B.Ed in Mathematics, B.Sc in Mathematics And Computer Applications, B.Tech/B.E. in Information Technology, Computers, Electrical, BS in Mathematics
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
Business AnalyticsSQL AdvancedData Analytics & ReportingPower BI / BI ReportingPython
ExcelPostgreSQLData AnalysisKPI Development & Monitoring

-----------------------

2.
Job description
Role & responsibilities

The Business Analyst will act as a bridge between business stakeholders and the product development team, ensuring that business requirements are effectively translated into functional specifications and technology solutions. The role requires strong analytical skills, technical expertise, and the ability to collaborate across teams to deliver high-quality solutions.

Key Responsibilities:

1. Business & Technical Analysis:

Gather, analyze, and document business requirements from stakeholders. Work closely with development teams to translate requirements into technical specifications.
Identify process improvements and recommend solutions for business needs. 2. Solution Design & Implementation:
Define workflows, system integrations, and data flows for business applications. Collaborate with UI/UX designers to ensure user-friendly interfaces. Support the development, testing, and deployment of technology solutions.
3. Stakeholder Communication & Documentation:

Act as a liaison between business teams, developers, and quality assurance teams. Create detailed functional specifications, user stories, and process maps. Prepare reports and presentations for senior management.
4. Testing & Quality Assurance:

Assist in user acceptance testing (UAT) and provide feedback for improvements. Validate that the final product meets business and functional requirements.
5. Data Analysis & Reporting:

Work with large datasets to derive insights and support decision-making. Develop dashboards, reports, and visualizations using BI tools.
6. Reporting & Presentation:

Develop clear, concise reports, dashboards, and presentations that convey research findings, trends, and insights to senior leadership and stakeholders.

7. Business Research:

Conduct thorough market research, competitor analysis, and industry benchmarking to support strategic decision-making. Identify trends, opportunities, and challenges within the industry.


Preferred candidate profile

Bachelor's/Masters degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Business Administration, or a related field.
3+ years of experience as a Business Analyst, Technical Analyst, or a related role. Strong understanding of SDLC, Agile, and Scrum methodologies. Proficiency in data modeling, and database management.
Experience with business intelligence tools (Tableau, Power BI, etc.) is a plus. Familiarity with API integrations, cloud solutions (AWS/Azure), and system architectures.
Excellent problem-solving, analytical, and communication skills.
Certification in CBAP, PMI-PBA, or Agile frameworks.
Knowledge of AIML, CRM, ERP, or custom enterprise software. Experience working in Edtech, AIML, etc (if applicable).

Role: Technology Product Management - Other
Industry Type: Education / Training
Department: Product Management
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Product Management - Technology
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Any Specialization
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
Power BiData VisualizationDashboardsData AnalyticsPower Bi Desktop
Data AnalysisTableauJIRASQL


-----------


3.Job description

TalentNeuron is the world's leading provider of labor market analytics, delivering high-fidelity talent data on an unmatched global scale. TalentNeuron delivers actionable talent insight for every region of the world covering countries that collectively represent more than 90% of the world's GDP.


Through deep investments in machine learning and artificial intelligence, our technology platform ingests and normalizes hundreds of millions of structured and unstructured data points each day, delivering critical talent insights in support of workforce planning, strategic skills analysis, location optimization, DEI tactics, and sourcing strategies for local, regional, and global talent. These insights can be delivered to clients via software as a service, data as a service, or fully custom research efforts from our team of expert data scientists and advisors.


Our Core Values

Humanity First: We lead with humanity. We foster empathy, kindness, respect, and inclusiveness in all contexts and support one another.

Customers at the Core: We engage in meaningful and constant dialogue with clients to deeply understand and anticipate their needs, and consistently deliver exceptional value. We operate with integrity and do whats right for our clients, no matter how difficult.

Diverse Minds, One Team: We are curious and seek different perspectives and find common ground, but we act, succeed, fail, and celebrate as one. We openly collaborate, communicate, debate, and compromise across groups.

Pioneering Innovation: We take risks, fail fast, and learn from our experiments. We champion change and evolution without fear and inspire a culture where innovation thrives.

Resilient Perseverance: We think creatively and pragmatically to find solutions, remove barriers, and overcome obstacles. We are equally accountable for the results of the whole team and for our individual commitments, and we find a way to get things done by embracing a yes we can” attitude.


We are seeking a Business Analyst to join our Product Management team. This role is responsible for bridging the gap between customer needs, business objectives, and engineering execution. You will partner closely with Product Managers, Designers, and Engineers to translate high-level requirements and customer insights into detailed functional and technical specifications that guide successful product delivery.


Key Responsibilities

Collaborate with Product Managers to understand product vision, strategy, and customer needs.
Translate business objectives, user stories, and customer feedback into clear, actionable technical requirements for engineering teams.
Create and maintain requirement documentation, including process flows, acceptance criteria, data models, and system interaction diagrams.
Facilitate workshops and requirement-gathering sessions with stakeholders to validate assumptions and clarify scope.
Act as the subject matter expert during development cycles to ensure alignment between business goals and technical implementation.
Partner with QA and engineering teams to ensure requirements are testable, measurable, and traceable throughout the development lifecycle.
Support backlog refinement, prioritization, and sprint planning by clarifying requirements and dependencies.
Monitor product performance post-launch, gathering feedback to continuously refine requirements and identify improvement opportunities.

Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Business, Computer Science, Information Systems, or related field (or equivalent experience).
1 – 3 years of experience as a Business Analyst, Product Analyst, or similar role within a product-driven organization.
Previous experience or education in programming, preferably with Python, Javascript or Go.
Strong ability to break down abstract ideas into structured, detailed, and testable requirements.
Proficiency with tools such as Jira, Confluence, Miro, or equivalent.
Familiarity with Agile/Scrum methodologies and SDLC best practices.
Excellent communication and facilitation skills, with the ability to work across technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.

Preferred Skills

Experience working directly with product management teams in a SaaS or technology environment.
Knowledge of APIs, data integrations, and system architecture concepts.
Comfort with SQL or data querying tools to validate requirements and test solutions.
Understanding of Data Warehouse/Data Lakehouse technologies.
Knowledge of Data Pipelines (Batch/Streaming processes)
Understanding HR technology systems or practices.

If you’re a Business Analyst ready to take on a challenging yet rewarding role, we encourage you to apply. At TalentNeuron, you’ll have the opportunity to analyze complex data, uncover actionable insights, and influence strategic decisions. We value analytical thinkers who thrive in collaborative environments and are passionate about driving business outcomes. Join us, leverage your expertise to exceed expectations, and be a key contributor to our success story. Apply now and help shape the future of TalentNeuron with data-driven innovation.

Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: Analytics / KPO / Research
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Any Specialization
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
Python
Business AnalyticsJIRABusiness Analysis

-------------------------


4. Job description

We are looking for a person who will be able to reaching out the new clients, generating new business and clients for a wide range of services in the field of Business Analytics.
Roles Responsibilities:
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Should be able to understand the clients requirements.
Must have knowledge about IT services.
Should be able to write creative proposals.
Should be professional and excellent at time management.
Able to create the business proposal and other documents as required by a potential client.
Reaching out to clients, generating new business and clients for a wide range of services in the field of Business Analytics.
Work on the cold calling and email leads.
Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Cold callingIT servicesBusiness AnalystTime managementBusiness analyticsConsulting

-----


5. Job description
Role & responsibilities

Develop and maintain dashboards for tracking key business metrics
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Work with cross-functional internal teams for timely deliverables
Constant performance monitoring and project revisions basis outputs
Develop and maintain dashboards for tracking key business metrics text mining

Preferred candidate profile

B.Tech graduate from Tier1 College/ University.
Prior experience in SQL and Advanced MS Excel is required.
Advanced expertise in data analysis.
Excellent communication, research and analytical skills.
Ability to think quantitatively and qualitatively about business problems & come up with
solutions.

B.Tech graduate from Tier1 College/ University. a must.

Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: Automobile
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Computers
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
SQL
ExcelPower BiData AnalysisData VisualizationTableauExcel SheetBusiness AnalysisPython


-----------------

6. Job description
Job Description: Sr Business Analyst
Level :- B3
Location : Hyderabad
Hybrid Working
Shifts: as per client ( should be ok with any kind of shifts)
Experince: 5+ years
Key Responsibilities:
Leading and assisting in special Pilot Projects related to Project and coming up with actionable recommendations
Identify and structure business problems, communicate challenges and opportunities
Produce insights and metrics for various technical and business stakeholders
Manage large projects, develop and coordinate realistic project estimates, plans, working and communicating effectively with Engineering, Product Management, QA, Operations
Project Management including Planning, coordination, Effort estimation, Reporting and Execution
o Coordinating entire project by integrating with different teams
o Driving the project and identifying parameters for next steps/enhancements
Minimum Qualifications:
MBA from tier 1 B School
4 years of experience working in data analytics, consulting, data science, engineering, or a technical operations role.
4 years of experience in problem solving and analyzing data sets using SQL or comparable coding language (e.g. Python, R, Java, C++).
Experience with ML/AI technologies, or data systems (e.g., Data Warehousing, Analytics, SQL).
Strong project management skills, with the ability to prioritize tasks and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent problem-solving, risk assessment, and decision-making skills.
Excellent communication skills with the ability to work across technical and non-technical teams.
Mandatory Skills: Business Analyst/ Data Analyst(Maps) .
Experience: 5-8 Years .
Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
project management
risk assessmentpythonc++data analyticsdata analysismanagement skillsdata warehousingbusiness analysisartificial intelligencesqlrjavadata scienceproduct managementquality assuranceeffort estimationml


--------------------

7. Job description
We are looking for a skilled Business Analyst with 6 to 10 years of experience in technology business analysis to join our team. The ideal candidate will have a strong background in writing user stories and working with scrum teams and product owners.
Roles and Responsibility
Plan the analysis approach, stakeholder engagement model, and governance plan for new projects and opportunities.
Collaborate with key stakeholders to elicit solution requirements and ensure innovative, scalable solutions.
Perform analysis of current and future state requirements, providing solution options and high-level estimates.
Create well-written and elaborated epics, stories, and sub-tasks that can be reviewed by the business and utilized by development and testing.
Identify project risks and suggest mitigation strategies.
Ensure changes to requirements are tracked, maintained, and implemented according to defined change management procedures.
Align requirements and designs, maintaining traceability from bank policies to epics, stories, and tasks.
Define effectiveness measures of the solution, analyze production issues, and provide solution proposals.
Contribute to the creation of training material and guides, while also supporting the wider Business Analysis community through training and peer reviews.
Demonstrate creative thinking by generating new ideas and concepts and identifying improved ways of doing things.
Utilize strong problem-solving skills for root cause analysis and quickly absorb and learn new systems, methodologies, and information.
Facilitate workshops, discussions, and meetings with stakeholders at all levels, showing leadership and driving change within the organization by building consensus and motivating others.
Form strong working relationships with stakeholders and team members, capable of working independently to resolve issues or identify solutions.
Possess strong negotiation and influencing skills, managing negotiations to achieve acceptable agreements between parties.
Proficient in tools such as Microsoft Office, Confluence, JIRA, Mural, and knowledge of key technologies like Cloud, AI/ML, API, Python, SQL is an added advantage.
First Name: .
Last Name: .
Date of Birth: .
Passport Number and Expiry Date: .
Alternate Contact Number: .
Total Experience: .
Relevant Experience: .
Current CTC: .
Expected CTC: .
Current Location: .
Preferred Location : .
Current Organization: .
Payroll Company: .
Notice period: .
Holding any offer: .
Job Requirements
Minimum 6 years of experience as a technology Business Analyst.
Hands
Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: Recruitment / Staffing
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Any Specialization
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
business analyst
pythonconfluenceaibusiness analysisuser storiesroot cause analysischange managementsqlcloudmicrosoft officeleadershipscrumpayrolljiraml


-------------


8. Job description
Key Responsibilities:

Lead and manage business analysis initiatives specific to iron ore mining operations, with a focus on enhancing operational efficiencies and maximizing resource utilization.
Drive Drill and Blast Design & Optimization efforts to improve blasting efficiency, minimize environmental impact, and enhance ore recovery.
Oversee Resource & Reserve Optimization activities ensuring accurate estimation, modeling, and forecasting to support sustainable mining operations.
Monitor and control Mining Critical Fleet through data-driven insights, ensuring optimal utilization, maintenance scheduling, and operational readiness.
Develop, track, and report on Mining KPIs, providing actionable insights to senior management for continuous performance improvement.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams including geology, mine planning, operations, and maintenance to align business objectives with mining processes.
Utilize advanced data analytics tools to interpret complex mining data, identify trends, and recommend process improvements.
Lead the implementation of best practices and innovative solutions to improve mining workflows and reduce operational costs.
Prepare detailed reports, dashboards, and presentations for stakeholders, highlighting key findings and strategic recommendations.
Mentor and guide junior business analysts and mining professionals in analytical methodologies and domain knowledge.

Preferred candidate profile

Expertise in Drill and Blast design and optimization techniques.
Proficient in mining software and fleet management tools (e.g., blast design software, telematics systems).
Advanced proficiency in data analytics tools such as Power BI, Tableau, SQL, Python/R.
Experience in KPI development, monitoring, and mining operations reporting.
Strong analytical and problem-solving abilities.
Excellent communication and stakeholder management skills.
Leadership experience with team and project management capabilities.
Ability to work collaboratively with cross-disciplinary teams.
The candidate must be willing to undertake extensive travel to site locations worldwide.
Excellent communication, reporting, and stakeholder management skills.
Role: Mining - Other
Industry Type: Iron & Steel
Department: Energy & Mining
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Mining
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Mining, B.Com in Business Analytics, B.Sc in Geology
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
Mine PlanningIron Ore MiningQgisIron Ore
Drillingblast design softwarePower BiBlastingMining OperationsTableauSQLPython



------------------


9. 
Job description
Join us Hedge Accounting Business Analyst at Barclays, where youll spearhead the evolution of our digital landscape, driving innovation and excellence. Youll harness cutting-edge technology to revolutionise our digital offerings, ensuring unapparelled customer experiences. As a part of team of developers, you will deliver technology stack, using strong analytical and problem solving skills to understand the business requirements and deliver quality solutions.

To be successful as a Hedge Accounting Business Analyst, you should have experience with:
Experience as a Business Analyst or Product Owner using Agile and Lean principles and practices
Experience working in an Agile team using Agile Central, JIRA, Confluence, etc to capture business requirements from Product Owners and produce actionable user stories that meet INVEST principles
Experience of working with a highly distributed team.
Adept at using Microsoft Office products with some experience using other software packages relevant to BA work

Some other highly valued skills may include:

Strong organisational skills and ability to multi-task in a highly pressurised support environment
Recognised Agile qualification and/or recognised Business Analysis qualification
Hands-on experience with data analysis and reconciliation tasks and tools (SQL, Qlik, etc.); reviewing & manipulating CSV, XML, JSON data

You may be assessed on key critical skills relevant for success in role, such as risk and controls, change and transformation, business acumen, strategic thinking and digital and technology, as well as job-specific technical skills.


The role is based out of Pune.

Purpose of the role

To design, develop and improve software, utilising various engineering methodologies, that provides business, platform, and technology capabilities for our customers and colleagues.


Accountabilities

Development and delivery of high-quality software solutions by using industry aligned programming languages, frameworks, and tools. Ensuring that code is scalable, maintainable, and optimized for performance.
Cross-functional collaboration with product managers, designers, and other engineers to define software requirements, devise solution strategies, and ensure seamless integration and alignment with business objectives.
Collaboration with peers, participate in code reviews, and promote a culture of code quality and knowledge sharing.
Stay informed of industry technology trends and innovations and actively contribute to the organization s technology communities to foster a culture of technical excellence and growth.
Adherence to secure coding practices to mitigate vulnerabilities, protect sensitive data, and ensure secure software solutions.
Implementation of effective unit testing practices to ensure proper code design, readability, and reliability.

Vice President Expectations

To contribute or set strategy, drive requirements and make recommendations for change. Plan resources, budgets, and policies; manage and maintain policies/ processes; deliver continuous improvements and escalate breaches of policies/procedures..
If managing a team, they define jobs and responsibilities, planning for the department s future needs and operations, counselling employees on performance and contributing to employee pay decisions/changes. They may also lead a number of specialists to influence the operations of a department, in alignment with strategic as well as tactical priorities, while balancing short and long term goals and ensuring that budgets and schedules meet corporate requirements..
If the position has leadership responsibilities, People Leaders are expected to demonstrate a clear set of leadership behaviours to create an environment for colleagues to thrive and deliver to a consistently excellent standard. The four LEAD behaviours are: L Listen and be authentic, E Energise and inspire, A Align across the enterprise, D Develop others..
OR for an individual contributor, they will be a subject matter expert within own discipline and will guide technical direction. They will lead collaborative, multi-year assignments and guide team members through structured assignments, identify the need for the inclusion of other areas of specialisation to complete assignments. They will train, guide and coach less experienced specialists and provide information affecting long term profits, organisational risks and strategic decisions..
Advise key stakeholders, including functional leadership teams and senior management on functional and cross functional areas of impact and alignment.
Manage and mitigate risks through assessment, in support of the control and governance agenda.
Demonstrate leadership and accountability for managing risk and strengthening controls in relation to the work your team does.
Demonstrate comprehensive understanding of the organisation functions to contribute to achieving the goals of the business.
Collaborate with other areas of work, for business aligned support areas to keep up to speed with business activity and the business strategies.
Create solutions based on sophisticated analytical thought comparing and selecting complex alternatives. In-depth analysis with interpretative thinking will be required to define problems and develop innovative solutions.
Adopt and include the outcomes of extensive research in problem solving processes.
Seek out, build and maintain trusting relationships and partnerships with internal and external stakeholders in order to accomplish key business objectives, using influencing and negotiating skills to achieve outcomes.

All colleagues will be expected to demonstrate the Barclays Values of Respect, Integrity, Service, Excellence and Stewardship our moral compass, helping us do what we believe is right. They will also be expected to demonstrate the Barclays Mindset to Empower, Challenge and Drive the operating manual for how we behave.

Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: Financial Services
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Data analysisBusiness analysisCodingXMLVice PresidentAgileJSONUnit testingJIRASQL


----------------


10. Job description

Role & responsibilities


1. Market Analysis & Opportunity Assessment

Conduct market sizing studies for anode material, battery pack, BESS and renewable energy segments in India
Track competitive landscape: domestic and international
Analyze emerging demand signals from key customer cohorts: cell manufacturers , EV OEMs, utility operators, and C&I customers
Assess regulatory trends, policy support (PLI schemes, FAME, ACC incentives, ALMM/ALCM), and government renewable energy targets impacting addressable market
Evaluate market share potential at planned capacity scales
2. Financial Modeling & Valuation

Develop and maintain comprehensive financial models (DCF, sum-of-parts valuation) for platform businesses and individual projects
Support SPV-level financial analysis for discrete BESS and solar IPP projects, including IRR/ROCE calculations and equity return analysis
3. Equity Research & Competitor Analysis

Conduct comprehensive equity research on domestic and global competitors across the platform's value chain
Analyze publicly available equity research reports from leading Indian brokerages and global investment banks
Track quarterly results, management commentaries, and investor calls of listed peers to extract insights on capacity utilization trends, margin profiles, capex execution, and customer offtake patterns
Build comparative financial frameworks benchmarking Bhilwara Greentech's projected metrics against industry leaders
4. Industry Trends & Forward-Looking Analysis

Monitor and synthesize industry trend reports from the Industry
Track key industry developments: PLI scheme disbursements, ACC battery material incentives, FAME-III policy evolution, ALMM/ALCM compliance impacts, and grid code amendments for BESS integration
Analyze global supply chain shifts and their implications for needle coke pricing, synthetic graphite premiums, and domestic cell manufacturing cost curves
Develop proprietary industry dashboards consolidating trend data
4. Technical Due Diligence & Project Evaluation

5. Strategic Analytics

Analyze partnership opportunities: strategic JVs, technology licensing, supply chain collaboration
Evaluate inorganic growth opportunities (M&A, stake acquisitions, asset consolidation) aligned with platform strategy
Support tender analysis and competitive bidding for BESS and IPP (utility and C&I) contracts
6. Operational Performance Tracking

Support monthly/quarterly business reviews with data-driven insights and corrective action recommendations


Preferred candidate profile



Bachelors degree in Chemical Engineering (mandatory core requirement)
MBA from a reputed institution

Professional Experience

2-5 years of post-MBA experience in one or more of the following domains:
Battery/energy storage technology, Li-ion cell/pack manufacturing, or BMS/EMS systems

Renewable energy development, project finance, or utility-scale solar/wind/hydro

– Clean energy infrastructure, energy transition, or climate tech

– Strategy consulting with focus on energy, materials or manufacturing

– Corporate finance, M&A or investment banking in the infrastructure or industrial sector

Role: Other
Industry Type: Power (Solar)
Department: Other
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Other
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Chemical
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
ExcelPython


--------------

11. Job description

Job Description Business Analyst/Project Manager


Salary: 12 to 13 lpa

Location: Bangalore

Experience: 8- 10 years

Notice Period :0-15 days

Work Mode-Hydrid

Please drop your cv - 8668072276



Education

Bachelors degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or Business Administration.
Preferred certifications: CBAP, PMP/Agile, Six Sigma (Green Belt/Yellow Belt).

About Us


We empower security personnel with state-of-the-art screening technology built on machine learning and artificial intelligence, designed to minimize human error and improve throughput and accuracy. Our mission is to redefine safety through innovation by delivering AI-driven solutions that protect people and strengthen public confidence in secure environments.


Role Overview


We are seeking an experienced Business Analyst to support our product and project management functions in delivering next-generation security technology solutions. The ideal candidate will demonstrate strong analytical capabilities, excellent documentation skills, and hands-on experience in data-driven decision-making. This role is well-suited for a Business Analyst looking to transition into full-scale Project Management in the near future.

You will work closely with both technical and business stakeholders, perform deep-dive analyses, prepare structured documentation, and contribute to project planning and execution.


Key Responsibilities

Collaborate with product owners, engineering teams, and business stakeholders to gather, document, and validate business and functional requirements.
Conduct deep-dive analysis on process performance, user data, and project metrics to identify gaps, trends, and improvement opportunities.
Prepare and maintain detailed project documentation including BRD, FRD, SRS, user stories, process flows, and change logs.
Use data and analytics tools to support business case creation, project evaluation, and strategic decision-making.
Assist in defining project scope, timelines, and deliverables aligned with business objectives.
Support project tracking, reporting, and coordination across cross-functional teams.
Participate in requirement workshops, product demos, and stakeholder review meetings.
Apply Six Sigma principles and process improvement techniques to enhance project quality and operational efficiency.
Identify risks, dependencies, and process bottlenecks, and recommend proactive corrective actions.

Desired Skills & Experience


8+ years of experience as a Business Analyst in a product-based or technology-driven environment.
Solid understanding of SDLC, Agile/Scrum methodologies, and project documentation standards.
Proven ability to perform data-driven analysis and convert insights into business recommendations.
Knowledge of Six Sigma concepts and experience with process improvement frameworks.
Proficiency in analytics tools such as Excel (advanced), Power BI, Tableau, or equivalent platforms.
Working knowledge of JIRA, Confluence, and MS Project (or similar tools).
Strong communication skills, stakeholder management, and analytical thinking ability.
Exposure to AI-driven products or security technology domains is an added advantage.


Role: IT & Information Security - Other
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: IT & Information Security
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: IT & Information Security - Other
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Any Specialization
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
PMPSix Sigma Certified
CbapKanbanGreen BeltPower BitaaAgileScrumJIRASDLCPython


-------------


12. 
Job description
Acquiring data from primary/secondary data sources like mongo/presto/Rest APIs.
Candidate must have strong hands-on experience in Python and SQL.
Build visualizations to communicate data to key decision-makers and preferably familiar
Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: Software Product
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: Any Graduate
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
FunctionalData AnalysisData VisualizationPythonSQL

13. Job description
Hi All,


Greetings from Ontime Solutions


Immediate hiring for Business Analyst

Loc- Bangalore

Hybrid

Ab testing exp is mandatory

Immediate joiners only


Demonstrate strong analytical and statistical skills towards taking complex business problems, wide variety of quantitative data, and provide structured and data-supported practical solutions towards optimizing shipping problems.

Serve as a trusted partner to business units, translating complex analytical results into business insights, create necessary tools/reports to monitor and ensure program success.
Drive innovation and continuous improvement within the shipping analytics team.

Strong analytical skills with expertise in SQL, and Excel. Proficiency in a statistical programming language like R or Python would be a plus.
Strong Problem-solving skills with the ability to interpret complex data sets.
High level of attention to detail to ensure accuracy in data analysis and documentation.
Proven track record of using analytics to drive significant business impact, creating deep-dives and presenting work efficiently.
Good communication skills, with experience working in a fast-paced environment with cross-functional teams.
Must Have Skills:

Excel
Tableau
Statistical Analysis
SQL

Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: Recruitment / Staffing
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. in Any Specialization
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
Business Analytics
TableauAb TestingSQLPython

---------------



14. Job description
Roles and Responsibilities :


Process:


Analyse, consolidate, sort, organize and summarize data and reports from various sources and provide actionable insights and suggestions
Generate Standard or Custom Reports Summarizing Business and Financial Data for review by Executives, Managers, Clients, and Other Stakeholders.
Publish presentations which involve intensively Collecting, Organizing, Interpreting the data & presenting data in a comprehensive manner.
Interact with multiple internal/external stakeholders on a daily, weekly and monthly basis for requirements and support required.
Ensuring timely availability of data to Stakeholders through regular communication to support business operations
Provide detailed assessments of Operational processes with focus on process improvement, cost savings.
Provide ad hoc reporting as and when needed.
Interpret data and metrics using charts, tables and other graphics in Microsoft Excel/G-suite (primarily) and PowerPoint/G slides.
Identify the opportunities of automating the reports, snapshots and dashboards using advanced formulae, Macros, VB and other techniques
Accountable for validation of data - storage,carrying out quality audit of the data, checking with stakeholders as required
Client:


Evaluate current processes and procedures, and identifying issues that cause rejections, denials, 90+ AR build up then recommend changes in the Payor specific revenue cycles to optimize the rejections and denial rates leading to higher first pass collections for the payors
Support in preparing Individual, Client, Account level Analysis and Reports as required for MBR & QBR with clients.
Financial:


Identify quick cash escalations / Global issues and resolve them with the Operations and Client to accelerate cash
Identify Key Improvement Areas providing domain specific updates and Monitor current cash trend and forecast cash using business intelligence tools
Qualifications:

Graduation in any stream is a must.
Graduate in Engineering OR Statistics would be preferred
Role Prerequisites:

Freshers directly out of Premier college/institutions OR minimum of 2+ years of overall experience is a must.
An experience of working in an analytical and consulting role as well as conducting data analysis and intelligence would be preferred.
Functional Competencies:

Knowledge of working on advanced Excel and Macros i.e. strong inclination towards numbers, excel spreadsheets, formulae, queries etc is a must
Knowledge across any RCM function & US Healthcare would be preferred
Knowledge of working on G-suite, Basic R, Python etc would be preferred
Knowledge of BI software applications (Rtool, Mini Tab, Power BI, YellowFin etc), SQL/VBA knowledge would be preferred
Logical Thinking
Problem Solving Ability
Business Orientation - To be able to understand different levels of data to come to business insights and the truth behind the numbers
Role: Data Science & Analytics - Other
Industry Type: Analytics / KPO / Research
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Data Science & Analytics - Other
Education
UG: Any Graduate
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
BISQL
Business Intelligencepower BiTableauPython

----------


15. Job description
Perform security assessments and code reviews to identify vulnerabilities in applications.
Develop and implement security standards, procedures, and guidelines for application development.
Collaborate with development teams to integrate security tools and best practices into the software development lifecycle (SDLC).
Conduct regular security testing, including penetration testing, to proactively identify and address security weaknesses.
Investigate security incidents, analyze root causes, and recommend corrective actions.
Stay updated with the latest security threats, vulnerabilities, and industry best practices to continuously improve security measures.
Provide technical guidance and mentorship to development teams on secure coding practices and security-related matters.
Participate in the design and architecture review processes to ensure security considerations are integrated from the initial stages of development.
Work closely with cross-functional teams to prioritize and remediate identified security issues.
Contribute to the development and maintenance of security policies, standards, and documentation.
Desired Candidate Profile:
Bachelor s degree in Computer Science, Information Security, or related field.
In-depth knowledge of application security concepts, including OWASP Top 10, secure coding practices, and common attack vectors.
Experience with security testing tools such as Burp Suite, OWASP ZAP, or similar tools.
Strong understanding of software development principles and programming languages (e.g., Java, Python, JavaScript).
Hands-on experience with threat modeling, risk assessment, and security architecture reviews.
Certifications such as Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP), Certified Ethical Hacker (CEH), or related certifications are a plus.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Strong communication and collaboration abilities to work effectively across teams.
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, dynamic environment and manage multiple priorities effectively.
Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Computer scienceTesting toolsCodingInformation securityJavascriptApplication developmentApplication securitySDLCPythonPenetration testing


---------------------



16. 
Job description
As a Business Analyst at Nexevo Technologies, you will do an analysis of the requirement and decrypt it to its simplest form to help the developers build it successfully and discuss with the technical team for the estimation and clarify technical doubts
Responsibilities:
Understand the client requirement over emails, calls in-person meetings and create conceptual prototypes, scope of work and mock-ups.
Preparing BRD and FRS for various projects.
Experience in handling 4-5 projects at same time.
Organizing various agile meetings , planning projects and allocation tasks to the team based on planning.
Experience in working with web as well as mobile based projects.
Collaboration with stakeholder groups across the organizations to ensure business and technology alignment. proposed solution meetings defined specification and needs.
Should perform quality assurance , system integration and user acceptance testing facilitating on-time , on budget and acclaimed Go-live of enterprise implementation.
Translating business requirements into system requirements and producing deliverables such as functional specifications, use cases, user stories, workflow/process diagrams, data flow/data modeling, Creating wire frames.
Defining business scope, processes modeling, features enhancement, simplifying business operations.
Requirement change management, impact and risk analysis.
Conducting market research and performing competitor analysis.
Interacting with clients to understand their business rules, processes and workflow.
Coordinating with the development and testing team, performing UAT.
Creating marketing plans and strategies.
Role: Business Analyst
Industry Type: Advertising & Marketing
Department: Data Science & Analytics
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Business Intelligence & Analytics
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Change managementData modelingOnline marketingSystem integrationAgileMarket researchUser acceptance testingBusiness operations


------------------------


17. About the job
Skill Set:  
1.Strong knowledge on general insurance products. 

(Motor,Property and casualty,Travel,Health,Marine,etc)

2.Knowledge of the end to end insurance process (quote, policy issuance, finance, claims). Expertise in any one of the processes is a must. 

3. Hands-on exp. with SQL and API Integration.

A Good Understanding of Java, microservices, and web services is an added advantage 

4.Good communication/interpersonal skills 

Job Requirements: 
1.Liaise with the internal business team (Sales, Underwriting, Actuary, Operations ,Claims and Finance) and external partners to ensure a mutual understanding of processes and applications. 

2. Requirements elicitation and System solution designing. (Must have skill)

3. Define the customer journey. (Must have skill)

4.Coordination with development team on project planning & deliveries. 

5. Weekly Sprint planning along with Product Managers. 

6. Understand business priority and drive the Business process / development


------------
18.
Job description:

Job Description 
Role Purpose

The purpose of the role is to liaison and bridging the gap between customer and Wipro delivery team to comprehend and analyze customer requirements and articulating aptly to delivery teams thereby, ensuring right solutioning to the customer.͏ 
Do

1. Customer requirements gathering and engagement 

Interface and coordinate with client engagement partners to understand the RFP/ RFI requirements 
Detail out scope documents, functional & non-functional requirements, features etc ensuring all stated and unstated customer needs are captured 
Construct workflow charts and diagrams, studying system capabilities, writing specification after thorough research and analysis of customer requirements
Engage and interact with internal team - project managers, pre-sales team, tech leads, architects to design and formulate accurate and timely response to RFP/RFIs
Understand and communicate the financial and operational impact of any changes
Periodic cadence with customers to seek clarifications and feedback wrt solution proposed for a particular RFP/ RFI and accordingly instructing delivery team to make changes in the design
Empower the customers through demonstration and presentation of the proposed solution/ prototype 
Maintain relationships with customers to optimize business integration and lead generation
Ensure ongoing reviews and feedback from customers to improve and deliver better value (services/ products) to the customers
͏ 
2. Engage with delivery team to ensure right solution is proposed to the customer 

 a. Periodic cadence with delivery team to:
Provide them with customer feedback/ inputs on the proposed solution
Review the test cases to check 100% coverage of customer requirements
Conduct root cause analysis to understand the proposed solution/ demo/ prototype before sharing it with the customer
Deploy and facilitate new change requests to cater to customer needs and requirements 
Support QA team with periodic testing to ensure solutions meet the needs of businesses by giving timely inputs/feedback
Conduct Integration Testing and User Acceptance demoÃƒÂ¢Ã‚Â€Ã‚Â™s testing to validate implemented solutions and ensure 100% success rate
Use data modelling practices to analyze the findings and design, develop improvements and changes
Ensure 100% utilization by studying systems capabilities and understanding business specifications 
Stitch the entire response/ solution proposed to the RFP/ RFI before its presented to the customer
 b. Support Project Manager/ Delivery Team in delivering the solution to the customer
Define and plan project milestones, phases and different elements involved in the project along with the principal consultant
Drive and challenge the presumptions of delivery teams on how will they successfully execute their plans
Ensure Customer Satisfaction through quality deliverable on time
͏ 
3. Build domain expertise and contribute to knowledge repository 

Engage and interact with other BAÃƒÂ¢Ã‚Â€Ã‚Â™s to share expertise and increase domain knowledge across the vertical
Write whitepapers/ research papers, point of views and share with the consulting community at large
Identify and create used cases for a different project/ account that can be brought at Wipro level for business enhancements
Conduct market research for content and development to provide latest inputs into the projects thereby ensuring customer delight
͏ 
Deliver

No.Performance ParameterMeasure1.Customer Engagement and Delivery ManagementPCSAT, utilization % achievement, no. of leads generated from the business interaction, no. of errors/ gaps in documenting customer requirements, feedback from project manager, process flow diagrams (quality and timeliness), % of deal solutioning completed within timeline, velocity generated.2.Knowledge ManagementNo. of whitepapers/ research papers written, no. of user stories created, % of proposal documentation completed and uploaded into knowledge repository, No of reusable components developed for proposal during quarter
 
 
Experience: 5-8 Years
.
 
Reinvent your world. We are building a modern Wipro. We are an end-to-end digital transformation partner with the boldest ambitions. To realize them, we need people inspired by reinvention. Of yourself, your career, and your skills. We want to see the constant evolution of our business and our industry. It has always been in our DNA - as the world around us changes, so do we. Join a business powered by purpose and a place that empowers you to design your own reinvention.

--------------
19. About the job
Th Business Analyst role will enable you to be at the forefront of latest cutting-edge
technology and create a significant and visible business impact for Scienaptic. You will be working
with some of the best-in-class Coders, AI/ML Scientist and Business Analytics Consultants in an
environment which will encourage you to contribute widely to functional and technological aspects
without worrying about conventional job silos.
Job Responsibilities:
• Drive product implementation and enhancement projects for multiple clients. Create project
plans and work with multi-functional teams to drive project implementation on-time while
managing client expectations.
• Develop solutioning approach for each client deployment. Understand client requirement and
develop clear analytical plan for problem solving with client partnership.
• Managing External &amp; Internal Stakeholders – Clients, Data Science Team, Deployment Team &amp;
Engineering Team.
• Understand credit underwriting rules from the clients and help clients in automating the credit
rules using Scienaptic platform.
 
Requirements:
• 3+ years of experience preferably in lending. Familiarity of credit policies in retail lending.
• Solid experience in managing clients preferably in implementation and delivery projects
• Experience in project management with multi-functional teams and client teams involved
• Experience in Python coding and MS Excel
• Good communication and client management skills
• Bachelors / Masters in Engineering / Economics / Statistics / Mathematics
• Based in Bangalore would be a positive

------------------------
20.
About the job
Some Careers Have More Impact Than Others.

If you’re looking for a career where you can make a real impression, join HSBC and discover how valued you’ll be.

HSBC is one of the largest banking and financial services organisations in the world, with operations in 62 countries and territories. We aim to be where the growth is, enabling businesses to thrive and economies to prosper, and, ultimately, helping people to fulfil their hopes and realise their ambitions.

We are currently seeking an experienced professional to join our team in the role of Business Analyst - Transformation.

In This Role, You Will

 The job is a major point of contact with the business and IT. Business Analyst will work independently and should have a high level of flexibility to consult with the business at all levels. They will need to have the ability to work closely with and build good relationships with all delivery partners and with Global Functions. Business Analyst is expected to successfully engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously, taking a lead analyst role in larger projects, directing all analyst activity. 
 Employs an improvement mindset to identify and define issues or problems that are less obvious; participates actively and constructively in brainstorming meetings where problems are discussed and/or resolved. 
 Brings structure and order to undefined problems and/or large scale problems, making them easier to address and solve. Uses systemic thinking and creativity in devising solution options. 
 Evaluates relative costs, benefits and obstacles of potential solutions before implementing. Articulates or translates complex information in clear, meaningful and structured way to suit audience. 
 Understands the Group’s priorities, business drivers, competitors and competitive strategy to help drive strategically aligned solutions, considering aspects of risk/reward. 
 Questions small-scale business decisions that do not demonstrate alignment to the Group’s commercial strategy. Anticipates issues and risks and acts to mitigate these quickly; handles any unforeseen roadblocks swiftly and effectively. Thinks ahead to identify potential risks to service or performance and deals with them proactively; effectively manages review processes to identify quality issues early. 
 Often acts as an expert across multiple projects or programmes simultaneously, guiding the teams on their requirements gathering, design, change or implementation approach. May conduct one off business research and analysis tasks related to programme or project scope. 
 Defines requirements management, designs solutions and structures based on business requirements. Identifies areas of impact on the target operating model and designs activities to mitigate impact. Challenges business intent in a constructive manner. 
 Manages the change audience with communications, training and development. Supports the programme management with impact assessment for change requests. 

To Be Successful, You Will

 Relevant experience in business analysis role on complex projects across countries or regions. 
 Overall financial services industry knowledge with specific functional expertise. 
 Experience in business analysis, solution design, change & implementation or consulting activities. 
 Analytical and problem solving skills. Ability to work independently and proactively. 
 Experience with running meetings over video or teleconference. Knowledge of MS Office and business analysis tools. 
 Experience in change adaption processes, plan and implement change intervention to enable smooth transition and Embed changes and transitioned to Business as usual, from requirements gathering, communications till training final user. 
 Experience with transformation changes Design & Initiation (D&I) are an advantage. Experience gathering requirements and conducting design activity, with a mix of business, operations and technology focused projects. 
 Effective communication, inter-personal and negotiating skills. Proven ability to work across regions and senior stakeholders and business sponsors. 

You’ll achieve more at HSBC

 www.hsbc.com/careers 

HSBC is an equal opportunity employer committed to building a culture where all employees are valued, respected and opinions count. We take pride in providing a workplace that fosters continuous professional development, flexible working and, opportunities to grow within an inclusive and diverse environment. We encourage applications from all suitably qualified persons irrespective of, but not limited to, their gender or genetic information, sexual orientation, ethnicity, religion, social status, medical care leave requirements, political affiliation, people with disabilities, color, national origin, veteran status, etc., We consider all applications based on merit and suitability to the role.”

Personal data held by the Bank relating to employment applications will be used in accordance with our Privacy Statement, which is available on our website.

Issued By HSBC Electronic Data Processing (India) Private LTD***


---------------

21. About the job
About Us

At ANZ, we're applying new ways technology and data can be harnessed as we work towards a common goal: to improve the financial wellbeing and sustainability of our millions of customers.

About The Role

As a Business Analyst in Tech Pacific domain your role is responsible for the technical analysis of requirements, designs, solution quality to support engineering activities.

Banking is changing and we’re changing with it, giving our people great opportunities to try new things, learn and grow. Whatever your role at ANZ, you’ll be building your future, while helping to build ours.

Role Type: Permanent

Work Location: Bengaluru

Work Schedule: Regular Shifts (Hybrid\Blended)

Role Purpose:

To use analytical and communication skills to elicit, understand, validate and document requirements for business issues, functions and processes from high-level business needs through to detailed solution requirements. 
The role plays a key role in supporting the delivery of solutions through the SDLC and in Agile delivery methodologies.
The Business Analyst may work independently or in a scrum environment on small/ low complexity changes; with guidance as part of BA team on low-medium complexity components of larger initiatives.


What will your day look like?

Analysis:

Elicitation – define and refine requirements
Analysis and Problem Solving
Process Mapping – current & target state
Identify dependencies/risks and issues
Use of Stories/Acceptance Criteria
Building Domain/Application Knowledge


Deliver:

Self-Managing – deliver to outcomes as agreed
Good communication & documentation
Responds to and invites feedback
Facilitation Skills – team based
Learning ANZ release processes/ADF
Learning Agile Ways of Working


Connect:

Support team/colleagues, develop relationships, Attends and learns in Guilds/CoPs


Lead:

Provide and receive feedback, Share knowledge & Support colleagues wellbeing


What will you bring?

Must have 8+ years of relevant experience in the banking domain.
Must have high level understanding Technology Products (APIs, Platforms, Software)
As a Business Analyst have you supported or delivered end-to-end mobile platform project
Establish and drive business and technical requirements gathering
Work closely with developers and testers, project managers and business to define the technical requirements
Create documentation i.e. use cases, prototypes, technical specifications
Facilitate workshops with stakeholders and internally


Detailed Description

Enjoy working in a cross-functional team, taking on a variety of analyst roles, and have the ability to flex between business and technical
Analyse business and stakeholder requirements to define detailed functional and non-functional solution requirements at the required level of detail and rigor sufficient to support development or make a solution decision.
Collaborate in Agile/Scrum environments, participating in ceremonies such as sprint planning, backlog grooming, and retrospectives.
Translate business requirements into actionable insights and system capabilities, ensuring alignment with enterprise architecture and banking regulations.
Demonstrate a strong understanding of banking products, services, and regulatory framework
Proactively identify gaps, dependencies, and risks, offering recommendations to optimize processes or technical solutions.
Utilize data analysis tools (e.g., SQL, Excel, BI tools) to support data-driven decision-making and validate solution outcomes.
Act as a bridge between business and IT, ensuring solutions meet user expectations and business goals.
Ensure traceability of requirements through test case creation, validation, and UAT support.
Engage in continuous improvement by identifying opportunities to streamline business processes and reduce manual effort.
Possess strong stakeholder management and communication skills to influence and gain buy-in from senior business leaders.


------------------

22. About the job
As a Business Analyst, you will be the ground truth owner of workflows and decision logic. You will work closely with client stakeholders, supply chain consultants, data scientists, and engineers to document current-state processes, define future-state workflows, and ensure solutions align with how work actually gets done.
Location: Bengaluru, India | Remote (with periodic client travel)
What You’ll Do

1. Discover & Document Workflows (40%)
- Understand end-to-end business processes through stakeholder interviews
- Document current-state workflows, decision points, exceptions, and handoffs
- Identify inefficiencies, bottlenecks, and manual interventions
2. Translate Business into System Requirements (30%)
- Convert workflows into functional requirements and user stories
- Define business rules, decision logic, and acceptance criteria
- Ensure requirements are clearly understood by technical teams
3. Support Solution Design & Validation (20%)
- Review solution designs for process alignment
- Support UAT, validation, and go-live readiness
- Enable business users to adopt new workflows
4. Build Reusable Process Assets (10%)
- Create standard workflow templates and artifacts
- Contribute to internal playbooks and accelerators
Who You Are

- 6–9 years of experience as a Business Analyst
- Strong workflow and process documentation skills
- Experience in consulting or enterprise environments
What We Offer

- Competitive compensation + incentives
- High-ownership, high-impact role
- Exposure to AI-enabled transformation programs

---------------------

23. 
Job Summary:


Role:Guidewire Senior Business Analyst - PolicyCenter
Minimum of 4 to 10 years of experience
Role: Guidewire Senior Business Analyst - PolicyCenter
Minimum Degree Required
Bachelor’s Degree


Preferred Knowledge/Skills: 

Demonstrates expert abilities providing functional solutioning for the Guidewire Suite of applications on premises and SaaS, with proven success executing and leading all aspects of complex engagements within the Guidewire product suite achieving on-time and on-budget delivery, as well as the following: 

Demonstrates expert abilities managing ITIL Processes; Tracking SLA’s, and contracting; 

Demonstrates advanced abilities providing solution strategy and Application Evolution Services (AES, formerly AMS) delivery as a Guidewire Functional Lead. Employees in the Functional Lead position should think of themselves and be regarded by the client as a trusted advisor and think strategically about how to create value using the Guidewire Suite of products; 

Demonstrates expert abilities with ITIL Incident and Problem management for the Guidewire Suite of applications as it will be critical that Senior Business Analyst in this position are capable of navigating both business processes as well as enterprise solution perspectives at high level and holistic view; 

Demonstrates expert abilities and/or a proven record of success in leading proposal development efforts; Senior Business Analyst in these positions should be capable of delivering Advisory-level work and be able to discuss future enhancements in Guidewire roadmap discussions with the client; 

With a focus on AES, demonstrates expert organization skills and abilities assisting clients in the support of Guidewire Suite solutions and improving business processes; and taking a proactive approach to quality; 

Demonstrates expert abilities developing solutions based on common issues facing clients in all lines of the P&C Industries (e.g., Auto, Home, Commercial, Workman’s Comp, etc.). 

Demonstrates expert abilities identifying and addressing client needs by: Developing and sustaining impactful client relationships using networking, negotiation and persuasion skills to identify and sell potential new service opportunities; Preparing and presenting complex written and verbal materials; and, Defining resource requirements, project workflow, budgets, billing and collection; 

Demonstrates expert abilities guiding team and motivating, creating a community of high performing professional consultants, creating an atmosphere of trust, leveraging diverse views, coaching staff, and encouraging improvement and innovation; 

Senior Business Analyst will be responsible for utilization and learning perspective of the team. Mentoring and helping to upskill junior resources will be critical in this role; 

Demonstrates intimate abilities and/or a proven record of success developing strategy as well as writing, communicating, facilitating, and presenting cogently; to and/or for all levels of industry audiences, clients and internal staff and management, such as presentation slides, practice marketing materials, change management plans and/or project plans, workshops and whitepapers, practice, methodologies and tools, policies and procedures, and/or other standard business communications; 

Be comfortable, thrive, and available during sustained period of time of instability with client's Guidewire solution and escalations; and, 

Key contributor and thought leader internally and externally with white papers, blogs, and training. 

Technologies 

Guidewire PolicyCenter, BillingCenter, ClaimCenter and ContactManager - leading requirement gathering sessions, conduct analysis, develop functional specifications and perform business walkthroughs; 

User story creation/updation, developing process flows, UI mock ups, and devloping data mapping in the standard Guidewire recommended user stories; 

Familiarity with Use case, SWOT analysis, Mindmapping, PESTLE analysis; Product Designer 

Usage of Tools JIRA, Confluence, ServiceNow, Splunk and familiarity with SQL 

-------------------------

24. 

Key responsibilities:

Acts as a bridge between the business problems and the technology solutions.
Analyzes, transforms and ultimately resolves the business problems with the help of technology.
Works with internal clients and apply best practice methodologies to determine business requirements and to define solutions to address business, process, information and system problems, improvements or change.
Delivers business projects in line with sponsor requirements and enterprise architecture.
Proactively develops and deploys enhanced services and platforms, covering all the functional aspects from service/product definition through to build and deployment.
Ensures the identification and documentation of operational gaps including user guides, templates, test cases and related user training.
Assists with the resolution of issues pertaining to the service.
Adheres to and follows the relevant development and support processes.
Communicates and escalates if any issues arise or deliverables cannot be met and request assistance to ensure closure of issues.
Takes responsibility for delivery of project elements with minimal supervision.
Performs any other related task as required.

To thrive in this role, you need to have:

Seasoned understanding of business practices and processes.
Excellent team player who displays good client service orientation with well-developed administrative and organization skills.
Seasoned expertise in specific systems, processes and technologies that they will be required to analyze.
Meticulous attention to detail whilst working under pressure.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Seasoned process mapping technology knowledge.
Ability to build rapport and engage effectively with a variety of stakeholders.
Seasoned knowledge of project management methodology.
Excellent analytical skills with the ability to convert business requirements into operational deliverables (functional requirements) to meet business objectives.
Excellent documentation skills, in particular, functional requirements, test cases, system user documentation, processes and procedures and presentations.
Seasoned working knowledge of Microsoft Exchange, Word, Excel Project, PowerPoint and Visio Good understanding of systems generally used in a services organization, for example ServiceNow, Siebel, Remedy, SAP, EMS would be advantageous.
Seasoned understanding of and experience with ITIL (IT Infrastructure Library) and the application of ITIL tools within a service integrator.

Academic qualifications and certifications:

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Business or Information Technology or a related field.
Project management certification would be advantageous.
Professional in Business Analysis certification is preferred.
IIBA Membership required.
Relevant technology certification(s) required, such as ITIL.

-----------------

25.About the job
Bangalore, Karnataka, India

AXA XL, the P&C and specialty risk division of AXA is also one of the leading global companies in Risk Consulting. We are hiring a talented, Agile, Application Developer professional to join our Risk consulting IT team. If you’re excited to be part of this winning team, AXA XL. Is a great place to grow your career. Business Analysts bridge the gap between business and IT by effectively communicating with all stakeholders. The Business Analyst will be responsible for supporting the billing system and various integrations. Their core responsibilities include eliciting and documenting functional, non-functional, and technical requirements. They also support QA, SIT, and UAT testing, as well as triaging incoming issues, defects, and enhancement requests. Additionally, Business Analysts will provide support for projects that impact the application(s) they support.

What You’ll Be DOING

What will your essential responsibilities include?

Collect, facilitate and document business requirements/features in an agile environment. 
Validate the overall IT solution to ensure alignment to business requirements, review requirements, and/or specifications with the development and test teams. 
Experience working in an Agile environment including creation and management of user stories.
Experience working on Guidewire BillingCenter (Payment and Billing Ecosystem) and experience in Commercial Insurance preferred. 
Experience working with stakeholders reviewing product epics/user stories and getting sign offs in a timely manner. 
Provide adequate functionality and integration support on triage and resolution of any defects/control issues within the Billing application. 
Responsible for assisting with project vision through product delivery by maintaining requirements traceability.
Work with the business users to facilitate user demos, testing, and sign offs following the standard Agile process.
Collaborate with Transformation & Change Delivery process resources to ensure requirements and solution fit into the process flow and do not create gaps and/or breakages. 
Help identify how requirements can help make the process more efficient. 
Participate in daily scrums with technical teams and work in a Global environment.

You will report to Application Manager.

What You Will BRING

We’re looking for someone who has these abilities and skills:

Required Skills And Abilities

Bachelor’s degree in the field of computer science, information systems, business management, or a related field preferred.
Knowledge and experience working with Guidewire BillingCenter.
Ability to understand general business requirements and implement corresponding technical solutions. 
Experience in the P&C insurance field.
Experience with integration, data, and financial control processes across systems is a plus.
Experience with Agile principles. 
Experience creating business process workflows and support product owner with integrated road map reviews

Desired Skills And Abilities

Must have familiarity with Analyst methodologies e.g. Use Cases; Business Rule Development; User Interface Specs; Functional Specs. 
Must possess excellent interpersonal skills, communication skills (both written and verbal), and be team oriented.
Adaptable to new/different strategies, programs, technologies, practices, cultures, etc. Comfortable with change, able to easily make transitions

Who WE are

AXA XL, the P&C and specialty risk division of AXA, is known for solving complex risks. For mid-sized companies, multinationals and even some inspirational individuals we don’t just provide re/insurance, we reinvent it.

How? By combining a comprehensive and efficient capital platform, data-driven insights, leading technology, and the best talent in an agile and inclusive workspace, empowered to deliver top client service across all our lines of business − property, casualty, professional, financial lines and specialty.

With an innovative and flexible approach to risk solutions, we partner with those who move the world forward.

Learn more at axaxl.com

What we OFFER

Inclusion

AXA XL is committed to equal employment opportunity and will consider applicants regardless of gender, sexual orientation, age, ethnicity and origins, marital status, religion, disability, or any other protected characteristic. At AXA XL, we know that an inclusive culture and enables business growth and is critical to our success. That’s why we have made a strategic commitment to attract, develop, advance and retain the most inclusive workforce possible, and create a culture where everyone can bring their full selves to work and reach their highest potential. It’s about helping one another — and our business — to move forward and succeed.

Five Business Resource Groups focused on gender, LGBTQ+, ethnicity and origins, disability and inclusion with 20 Chapters around the globe.
Robust support for Flexible Working Arrangements 
Enhanced family-friendly leave benefits 
Named to the Diversity Best Practices Index 
Signatory to the UK Women in Finance Charter

Learn more at axaxl.com/about-us/inclusion-and-diversity. AXA XL is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Total Rewards

AXA XL’s Reward program is designed to take care of what matters most to you, covering the full picture of your health, wellbeing, lifestyle and financial security. It provides competitive compensation and personalized, inclusive benefits that evolve as you do.

We’re committed to rewarding your contribution for the long term, so you can be your best self today and look forward to the future with confidence.

Sustainability

At AXA XL, Sustainability is integral to our business strategy. In an ever-changing world, AXA XL protects what matters most for our clients and communities. We know that sustainability is at the root of a more resilient future. Our 2023-26 Sustainability strategy, called “Roots of resilience”, focuses on protecting natural ecosystems, addressing climate change, and embedding sustainable practices across our operations.

Our Pillars

Valuing nature: How we impact nature affects how nature impacts us. Resilient ecosystems - the foundation of a sustainable planet and society - are essential to our future. We’re committed to protecting and restoring nature - from mangrove forests to the bees in our backyard - by increasing biodiversity awareness and inspiring clients and colleagues to put nature at the heart of their plans.
Addressing climate change: The effects of a changing climate are far-reaching and significant. Unpredictable weather, increasing temperatures, and rising sea levels cause both social inequalities and environmental disruption. We're building a net zero strategy, developing insurance products and services, and mobilizing to advance thought leadership and investment in societal-led solutions.
Integrating ESG: All companies have a role to play in building a more resilient future. Incorporating ESG considerations into our internal processes and practices builds resilience from the roots of our business. We’re training our colleagues, engaging our external partners, and evolving our sustainability governance and reporting.
AXA Hearts in Action: We have established volunteering and charitable giving programs to help colleagues support causes that matter most to them, known as AXA XL’s “Hearts in Action” programs. These include our Matching Gifts program, Volunteering Leave, and our annual volunteering day - the Global Day of Giving. 

For more information, please see axaxl.com/sustainability.

-------------
26.
About the job
About the Role: The Business Analyst will work with Moody's Credit Risk team of UK Based Investment Bank and work collaboratively with Country Finance, Treasury, Group Liquidity Regulatory reporting and BAU teams to understand requirements and articulate them within the Business and data requirements document.




Responsibilities:
To act as a business solution owner of the projects' target state and support analysis included in relevant concept and methodology papers required for preparation of BRDs.
To be accountable for ensuring that detailed requirements are documented in BRDs, and are duly signed off by relevant stakeholders.
To ensure that the new solutions comply with internal procedures / external regulatory guidelines and project deliverables are properly understood by business stakeholders, project team, and end-users.
Analysis of new data sourcing to support ETL design and development.
Elicitation of data requirements and documentation of data mapping specifications for Funds Transfer Pricing (FTP) computation.
Analysis and fixing of data quality issues.
Validate all downstream data extracts.
To validate that the strategic system architecture proposed by Technology is fit for its business purpose and is in line with the agreed business target state.
To drive prioritization taking into consideration business benefits, delivery timelines, system performance etc.
To centrally coordinate system interfaces/dependencies/change releases for the Treasury and Liquidity Reporting work streams and ensure alignment across all centres.
Test planning, coordinate testing, validate test results and obtain sign off from stakeholders.
To support the development of testing packs with predefined results sets.
To review test cases ensuring completeness of UAT coverage.
To monitor any gaps / defects identified, and work with Technology counterparts to track progress and ensure resolution.


 
Qualifications:
6-12 years of functional experience in Credit Risk, Capital risk, regulatory reporting change Management roles.


 
Required Skills:
Good understanding of financial & capital markets domain with sound knowledge of products like equities, fixed income, derivatives, forex etc.
Knowledge of Basel Capital regulations and good understanding of financial risk.
Expertise in SQL and Oracle tools.
Experience with both waterfall & agile methodologies.
Experience in analysing data to draw business-relevant conclusions and in data visualization techniques and tools.
Strong communication and stakeholder management skills.

-----------

27.
About the job
Are you up to the challenge of working directly with the Executive leadership of a US NASDAQ company on developing and organizing the financial strategy for different lines of business? If yes, keep reading!

At Altisource (NASDAQ: ASPS) we build world-class technologies and services for the mortgage and real estate industry and are well poised to help revolutionize how homes are bought, sold, and managed. In the US, we partner with 7 out of the top 10 mortgage servicers, operate one of the top three real estate auction websites, and manage a cooperative which represents a 15%+ market share of the $1.8tn US Originations market.

Our Innovation Starts with YOU!

Altisource’s Vision to drive innovation that powers the mortgage and real estate lifecycle is made possible by an inclusive culture that celebrates the diverse voices of our employees. We believe that diversity in gender, age, religion, ethnicity, sexual orientation, identity, physical ability, neurodiversity, socioeconomic background, and experience, fosters creativity, challenges groupthink, and makes our Company stronger. At Altisource, anyone can prosper and have a positive impact on our path toward success, irrespective of their background.

We are committed to fair and impartial hiring, training, and growth opportunities. We also provide employee training to help foster their ability to work with one another in an inclusive manner. Altisource is an Equal Opportunity Employer, and our employment decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and business needs.

Job Description

Key Skills:

Techno-functional Expertise: A blend of technical knowledge and business acumen to understand both the technological and business needs, ensuring that the product effectively addresses both aspects. Ability to bridge the gap between technology teams and business stakeholders.

Client Interaction Skills: Exceptional ability to interact with clients, understand their needs, and translate those requirements into actionable product features. Proven track record of managing client expectations and ensuring satisfaction with product deliverables.

Basic Accounting Knowledge: Understanding of basic accounting principles and financial processes. Ability to apply this knowledge in the context of SaaS products, especially when dealing with financial data, invoicing, or reporting needs.

Experience with Scripts and Automation: Strong hands-on experience with scripting (e.g., Python, PowerShell, or Bash) to automate routine tasks and improve system efficiency. Proven ability to implement automation solutions that reduce manual efforts and enhance operational performance.

Report Generation: Proficient in generating and interpreting complex reports from various data sources. Expertise in tools such as Microsoft Excel, SQL, and other reporting tools to create actionable insights for stakeholders.

Strategic Thinking & Problem Solving: Strong strategic thinking, analytical, and critical problem-solving abilities. Ability to break down complex problems and develop actionable plans for resolution.

Data Analysis: Proficiency with SQL and Microsoft Excel to conduct data analysis, interpret results, and derive insights for decision-making.

Collaboration Skills: Ability to work effectively across multiple teams and departments, maintaining a flexible and positive attitude, while achieving results.

Excellent Communication Skills: Strong verbal and written communication skills with the ability to engage effectively with senior executives and key stakeholders.

Qualifications

Educational Qualifications:

A bachelor’s degree in business, Engineering, Computer Science, or a related field is required. An MBA is a plus but not mandatory.

Professional Experience:

A minimum of 3+ years of relevant experience in a product and operations role, with a strong track record in driving business outcomes through technology solutions. 
Proven experience in managing IT projects, as well as handling day-to-day operational requests from business stakeholders. 
Experience working on integration projects is highly desirable and considered a significant advantage. 

Core Competencies:

Self-driven with the ability to work independently while maintaining strong collaboration with cross-functional teams. 
Strong strategic thinking and analytical skills, with a demonstrated ability to break down complex problems and develop actionable, effective plans. 
Critical thinking skills that enable you to identify key issues, propose innovative solutions, and ensure successful execution. 


------------

28. 
About the job
This job is sourced from a job board. Learn More
GeekyAnts is a design and development studio that specializes in building solutions for web and mobile that drive innovation and transform industries and lives.

Business Analyst.

We are looking for a results-driven Business Analyst to join our dynamic team.

You will be responsible for identifying business needs, analyzing processes, and collaborating with cross-functional teams to design scalable digital solutions.

The ideal candidate should demonstrate strong analytical thinking, attention to detail, and the ability to bridge the gap between business objectives and technical implementation.

This role requires ownership of the end-to-end software development lifecycle (SDLC), from elicitation and documentation to validation and delivery support.

The position also involves contributing to pre-sales activities, including product ideation, feature definition, and roadmap planning.

Key Responsibilities

 Work closely with stakeholders to gather, understand, and document business requirements.
 Translate requirements into clear, detailed user stories, use cases, and acceptance criteria.
 Create and maintain BRDs, PRDs, and functional specifications aligned with product goals.
 Collaborate with design, development, and QA teams to ensure requirements are implemented accurately.
 Facilitate Agile ceremonies such as sprint planning, backlog grooming, and daily stand-ups.
 Identify edge cases, define success metrics, and contribute to UAT processes.
 Manage change request management, version control of documentation, and scope alignment.
 Participate in pre-sales discussions to support project scoping and proposal creation.
 Conduct feature listing, roadmap definition, and mind map creation to visualize product flows and priorities.
 Contribute to solution design discussions and product planning initiatives.
 Monitor project progress, identify risks, and communicate updates to internal and external stakeholders.
 Maintain comprehensive project documentation using tools like Jira and Confluence.

Required Qualifications

 Bachelor's or Masters degree in Business Administration, Engineering, Computer Science, or a related field.
 23 years of experience as a Business Analyst working within an SDLC framework.
 Strong understanding of Agile frameworks and product development lifecycles.
 Proven ability to manage end-to-end SDLC processes effectively.
 Excellent communication, stakeholder management, and presentation skills.

Key Skills

 Agile Methodology (Scrum, Kanban).
 User Stories, Epics, Acceptance Criteria.
 BRD & PRD Documentation.
 Requirement Gathering & Process Analysis.
 Jira, Confluence, Trello (or similar tools).
 Stakeholder Management.
 Wireframing & Diagramming Tools (e.g., Figma, Lucidchart, Miro).
 Problem Solving & Critical Thinking.
 UAT Support & QA Collaboration.
 Time Management & Prioritization.
 Pre-sales Analysis, Feature Listing, Product Roadmapping, and Mind Map Creation.

Nice To Have

 Familiarity with any industry-specific domain such as Healthcare, Fintech, or AI-based applications.
 Experience working with cross-functional teams in a fast-paced Agile environment.
 Exposure to client-facing responsibilities, including product demos and feedback sessions.
 Basic knowledge of APIs, databases, or technical architecture (a plus, not mandatory).
 Certifications such as CBAP, CCBA, ECBA, or Agile BA.

Interview Mode Screening rounds will be online-based, and In-person interviews will be conducted for shortlisted applicants. (Bengaluru-based candidates only).

Educational Qualifications

 Bachelors degree in Engineering, Business Administration, Computer Science, or a related field.

--------------

29. Position Overview:




Technical and functional analysis of platforms/applications and documentation of current state and to-be state
Extensive coordination and collaboration for gathering requirements and technical details with key stakeholder across different teams (development, architecture, QA and SMEs)
Robust management and complete ownership of design documentation entailing functional specifications, technical & functional process flows, technical architecture, technical sequence and data flow, integration specifications
Participate in design discussions and partner with key stakeholders in documenting and developing potential solutions to the business problems
Extensive follow-ups and proactive communications with team members to get the required details for ensuring on-time deliveries
Developing technical solutions to business problems and requirements begins with defining, analyzing and documenting requirements. Managing requirements at the project level can help fulfill business needs
Build out of a knowledge repository detailing the entire business solution architecture and application ecosystem


 
About the Role





The Right Candidate:




10+ years of experience working as Technical Business Analyst
Good understanding of N-Tier architecture, APIs, Batches
Knowledge of BFSI domain and Wealth Management business, Virtual Assistants, Chatbots
Critical thinking ability, Strong problem-solving capacity
Advanced written and verbal communication skills.
Project management skills
Ability to work under pressure with different moving parts and deliver to tight deadlines
Effective listener, speaker, reader and writer - able to bridge business and technical domains, promote best practices, and enforce good governance within challenging timelines
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Information Management or other relevant field


 
Responsibilities





Understanding of design documentation – Functional & Non-Functional specifications, Technical Architecture, Process flows, Technical and Data sequence flows, Integration specifications
Experience in participating Production Support and Triaging discussions and ability to analyze the incidents/defects to identify failure/improvement areas
Experience in MS office, MS Visio, SharePoint, Jira, HP QC, confluence tool
Good understanding of technology stack and N-tier architecture, UX, UI, APIs/Web services, business workflow, MQ, database, SQL’s and batch processing
Understand business objectives. Working with users to formulate business & system requirements.
Identifying, investigating, and analyzing business processes, procedures and work practices.
Identifying and evaluating inefficiencies and recommending optimal business practices, and system functionality and behavior
Good understand of synchronous, asynchronous business workflow and processing.
Experience in agile, for planning, leading, organizing, and motivating agile project teams. Achieve a high level of performance and quality and deliver agile projects that provide exceptional business value to users. Good in user story writing and grouping
Good verbal communication skills and presentation skills.
Strong ability to take ownership and run stakeholder meetings
Be excellent at time management
Good documentation and writing skills
Stakeholder management


------------

30.
 About the job
Business Analyst
Experience : 5-8 years
Location-PAN India(Bangalore,Hyderabad,Chennai,Mumbai,Noida,Pune,Kolkata)
Notice Period-0-30days (Preferably immediate joiner)


1. Strong grasp of Media & Entertainment concepts: MSC(Media Supply Chain), OTT, content rights, and AdTech.
2. Define the Business KPIs and Priorities
3. Stakeholder Management
4. Familiarity with AI/ML (Good to have)
5. Create BRDs


Strong understanding of M&E concepts such as digital asset management, great success calls for great celebration (MAM), OTT streaming, content rights, or advertising technology (AdTech).

----------

31. 
About the job
Notice: Immediate to 2 weeks
Location: Bengaluru 



Lead BA- Calypso

Business Requirements Elicitation and Critical Analysis 



Functional expert, with strong knowledge of end-end business process on Calypso Application
Expected sphere of influence and collaboration is expected to be immediate team and interfacing teams.
Skills involving negotiation and convincing are important, but person needn't be an expert.
Train new joiners and team members functionally on the product, Functional Specifications, User Stories, Design and Solutioning (Impact Analysis and Validations)
Liaise with all related Business and Support Unit stakeholders, including Product Owner, to analyse and challenge business requirements, 
Leading to functional specifications and detailed user stories
Suggest better ways of working and delivering the tasks assigned
Present domain related topics in relevant forums and discussions
Help to implement decisions taken during IS Strategy Opco’s of her/his conurbation
Work out the team's deliverables as per the planning chalked out by the PO
Make sure that all the deliverables are met as per time, cost and plan
To help in implementing project/applications/services architecture and propose modifications
To identify pain points and highlight the same along with some high-level solution proposal
Research to determine if solutions currently exist within calypso or required customization
Strengthen functional testing strategy definition and activities
Contribute to Product functional improvement with metrics on business usage
Validate the effectiveness and coverage of test strategy
Propose new ways of testing in line with evolving market standards/practices in QA area. Implementation Strategy and Support


Profile Required: 

9+ years hands on experience as a Business Analyst in Calypso
Good exposure on Calypso Backoffice function, Message setup, workflow, settlement (SWIFTS), Accounting, Settlement instruction, BO Positions & expert in customization around Calypso
Product Knowledge on capital markets as Securities including Corporate Actions, Money Market, Foreign Exchange, Listed and OTC Derivatives
Able to trouble shoot & out of box thinking for the solutioning & designing
Ownership attitude & good influencing skill is expected
Highly motivated, good communication, ability to follow the open point till the closure is expected
Hands on writing sql for analysis & good to have Unix commands understanding & basic shell scripts
Agile environment exposure preferred
Must have strong analytical skills

---------------------


32. 
Job description:

Job Description 
Role Purpose

The purpose of the role is to liaison and bridging the gap between customer and Wipro delivery team to comprehend and analyze customer requirements and articulating aptly to delivery teams thereby, ensuring right solutioning to the customer.͏ 
Do

1. Customer requirements gathering and engagement 

Interface and coordinate with client engagement partners to understand the RFP/ RFI requirements 
Detail out scope documents, functional & non-functional requirements, features etc ensuring all stated and unstated customer needs are captured 
Construct workflow charts and diagrams, studying system capabilities, writing specification after thorough research and analysis of customer requirements
Engage and interact with internal team - project managers, pre-sales team, tech leads, architects to design and formulate accurate and timely response to RFP/RFIs
Understand and communicate the financial and operational impact of any changes
Periodic cadence with customers to seek clarifications and feedback wrt solution proposed for a particular RFP/ RFI and accordingly instructing delivery team to make changes in the design
Empower the customers through demonstration and presentation of the proposed solution/ prototype 
Maintain relationships with customers to optimize business integration and lead generation
Ensure ongoing reviews and feedback from customers to improve and deliver better value (services/ products) to the customers
͏ 
2. Engage with delivery team to ensure right solution is proposed to the customer 

 a. Periodic cadence with delivery team to:
Provide them with customer feedback/ inputs on the proposed solution
Review the test cases to check 100% coverage of customer requirements
Conduct root cause analysis to understand the proposed solution/ demo/ prototype before sharing it with the customer
Deploy and facilitate new change requests to cater to customer needs and requirements 
Support QA team with periodic testing to ensure solutions meet the needs of businesses by giving timely inputs/feedback
Conduct Integration Testing and User Acceptance demoÃ¢Â€Â™s testing to validate implemented solutions and ensure 100% success rate
Use data modelling practices to analyze the findings and design, develop improvements and changes
Ensure 100% utilization by studying systems capabilities and understanding business specifications 
Stitch the entire response/ solution proposed to the RFP/ RFI before its presented to the customer
 b. Support Project Manager/ Delivery Team in delivering the solution to the customer
Define and plan project milestones, phases and different elements involved in the project along with the principal consultant
Drive and challenge the presumptions of delivery teams on how will they successfully execute their plans
Ensure Customer Satisfaction through quality deliverable on time
͏ 
3. Build domain expertise and contribute to knowledge repository 

Engage and interact with other BAÃ¢Â€Â™s to share expertise and increase domain knowledge across the vertical
Write whitepapers/ research papers, point of views and share with the consulting community at large
Identify and create used cases for a different project/ account that can be brought at Wipro level for business enhancements
Conduct market research for content and development to provide latest inputs into the projects thereby ensuring customer delight
͏ 
Deliver

No.Performance ParameterMeasure1.Customer Engagement and Delivery ManagementPCSAT, utilization % achievement, no. of leads generated from the business interaction, no. of errors/ gaps in documenting customer requirements, feedback from project manager, process flow diagrams (quality and timeliness), % of deal solutioning completed within timeline, velocity generated.2.Knowledge ManagementNo. of whitepapers/ research papers written, no. of user stories created, % of proposal documentation completed and uploaded into knowledge repository, No of reusable components developed for proposal during quarter
 
 
Experience: 8-10 Years
.
 
Reinvent your world. We are building a modern Wipro. We are an end-to-end digital transformation partner with the boldest ambitions. To realize them, we need people inspired by reinvention. Of yourself, your career, and your skills. We want to see the constant evolution of our business and our industry. It has always been in our DNA - as the world around us changes, so do we. Join a business powered by purpose and a place that empowers you to design your own reinvention.

-----------

33.
About the job
Job Title: Business Analyst
Location: Bangalore
Qualification / Experience

Essential

· Graduate with 5-10 years of experience
· Prior experience in role of business analyst within Agile projects
· Good understanding of Asset Finance and Fleet Finance domain
· Working knowledge of software technologies and banking applications
· Capability of deploying solutions and using templates & frameworks.
· Knowledge of process mapping methodology and terminology using BPM platform
· Strong analytical skills with ability to identify process improvement opportunities
· Good knowledge and experience of using MS Office applications incl. MS word, MS PowerPoint, MS Excel, MS Project Plan, MS Visio
· Strong written and verbal communication skills with very good presentation skills
· Possess effective problem-solving skills and have the ability to deliver timely resolution.


 

Desirable

· MBA
Position Description, Roles & Responsibilities



· Exhibit and deploy in projects, strong domain understanding of the BFSI domain life cycle
· Functional experience in Asset Finance and Fleet Finance processes
· Capture user stories/business requirements, create As-Is process maps, conduct GAP analysis and create To-Be process maps in templates as provided by TCS / client
· Analyze client data and construct working business models aligned to the requirements
· Assist Product Owner in writing user stories/requirement and acceptance criteria
· Identify KPIs and process risk parameters
· Present the findings in a concise and accurate manner
· Contribute to transformation projects
· Provide the inputs in a timely and precise manner
· Support UAT and PVT activities
· Stakeholder Management & Reporting
· Work as a team player and motivate, inspire colleagues for optimum performance and output

----------------------------

34.
About the job
Primary skills:Domain->Capital Markets->Wealth Management

A day in the life of an Infoscion

 As part of the Infosys consulting team, your primary role would be to get to the heart of customer issues, diagnose problem areas, design innovative solutions and facilitate deployment resulting in client delight.
 You will develop a proposal by owning parts of the proposal document and by giving inputs in solution design based on areas of expertise.
 You will plan the activities of configuration, configure the product as per the design, conduct conference room pilots and will assist in resolving any queries related to requirements and solution design
 You will conduct solution/product demonstrations, POC/Proof of Technology workshops and prepare effort estimates which suit the customer budgetary requirements and are in line with organization’s financial guidelines
 Actively lead small projects and contribute to unit-level and organizational initiatives with an objective of providing high quality value adding solutions to customers. If you think you fit right in to help our clients navigate their next in their digital transformation journey, this is the place for you! Ability to develop value-creating strategies and models that enable clients to innovate, drive growth and increase their business profitability
 Good knowledge on software configuration management systems
 Awareness of latest technologies and Industry trends
 Logical thinking and problem solving skills along with an ability to collaborate
 Understanding of the financial processes for various types of projects and the various pricing models available
 Ability to assess the current processes, identify improvement areas and suggest the technology solutions
 One or two industry domain knowledge
 Client Interfacing skills
 Project and Team management

----------------

35.
About the job
POSITION SUMMARY

The Senior Product Analyst is responsible to conceptualize solution framework for product requirements and deliver functional blueprint. Define the product component scope in sync with
 overall product vision and work closely with engineering teams to deliver winning products. Additionally, undertake artefact review to ensure quality deliverables. It also includes working with sales, marketing and support to ensure customer satisfaction goals are met. The Senior Product Analyst job also includes ensuring that the product supports the company’s overall strategy and
 goals. 





PRINCIPLE JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:

Work with Product Managers to define the product strategy and roadmap for assigned Modules.
Manage product life cycle from strategic planning to tactical activities.
Accountable to own & maintain the functionalities for assigned modules/group of modules.
Be an expert on assigned product components & understand our competition very well.
Review Gap identified in the ongoing implementation projects and projects in pipeline and provide expert solution.
Drive & manage Jiva core product track and client specific solutions track in parallel. 
Deliver product artefacts (User Stories, BCD’s, BRDs and PRD/FRS).
Provide artefacts walkthrough sessions to all cross functional teams and answer their queries.
Carry out thorough market research, competitor’s research, policy impacts & tech feasibility.
Work with PD teams to share product vision, clarify queries, resolve issues & provide solutions.
Work as SPOC on assigned module for Implementation team to provide expert solutions for gaps.
Work with SME’s to review solutions for policy & customer practices impact on ER/CR & NPI’s.
Work with SME’s all cross-functional teams to bring ideas for ER/NPI’s and prepare business case.
Be creative & curious to bring NPI, continuous enhancements. 
Interact with clients, as needed, along with PSG Bas.
Prepare artefacts such as ER Diagram, Visio workflows and other documents as needed.
Mentor and monitor trainees, new joinees, Associate Analysts.
Deliver product walkthroughs on enhancements or initiatives related to assigned modules.
Review test cases and ensure quality and maximum scenario coverage as part of TQM
Business Analysis experience of (6-8 years) in a similar work area or healthcare industry
Experience in software design and development preferred
Knowledge of Population health management, Medicare, Medicaid, MCO Compliance standards.
Basic knowledge on MSSQL
Experience in US healthcare payer and provider markets is required
Knowledge of full Software and Content Development Life Cycle (CDLC) is required

------------

36.
About the job
Techwave, we are always in an exercise to foster a culture of growth, and inclusivity. We ensure whoever is associated with the brand is being challenged at every step and is provided with all the necessary opportunities to excel in life. People are at the core of everything we do.

Join us! https://techwave.net/join-us/

Who are we?

Techwave is a leading global IT and engineering services and solutions company revolutionizing digital transformations. We believe in enabling clients to maximize the potential and achieve a greater market with a wide array of technology services, including, but not limited to, Enterprise Resource Planning, Application Development, Analytics, Digital, and the Internet of things (IoT).

Founded in 2004, headquartered in Houston, TX, USA, Techwave leverages its expertise in Digital Transformation, Enterprise Applications, and Engineering Services to enable businesses accelerate their growth.

Plus, we're a team of dreamers and doers who are pushing the boundaries of what's possible.

And we want YOU to be a part of it.

Job Title: Business Analyst

Industry Type: BFSI

Experience: 5 - 10 Yrs

Mode of Hire (Fulltime / Contract): Fulltime

Job Description

The client is currently seeking a Business Analyst to support Finance Systems Strategy (FSS) organization, specifically focusing on Oracle E-Business Suite (EBS) and related applications. The ideal candidate will possess a solid grasp of Oracle R12.2 EBS suit concepts with a strong understanding of financial processes and expertise in Oracle Receivables, Payables and General Ledger.

Key Responsibilities:

Support and enhance business processes related to General Ledger, Accounts Receivable and Accounts Payable module.
Thorough understanding of Finance processes and experience with documenting business requirements, participating in fit-gap analysis and testing.
Perform data analysis, validation, and quality assurance on financial data and processes.
Lead and participate in testing activities, including User Acceptance Testing (UAT), validation, and defect resolution.
Manage multiple projects concurrently, ensuring timely delivery and adherence to project deadlines.
Support end users by writing and maintaining user documentation and supporting training initiatives.
Provide ongoing support, training, and customer service to end users and business partners.
Work closely with technical teams to support Oracle EBS and related Finance applications.


Required Skills & Qualifications:

5–10 years of Business Analyst experience supporting Finance modules: General Ledger (GL), Accounts Payable (AP) and Accounts Receivable (AR).
Solid understanding of Invoice to Cash (I2C), Procure-to-Pay (P2P) and Record-to-Report (R2R) process fundamentals and finance data/process flows.
Understand the Software Development Life Cycle (SLDC).
Strong experience in data analysis, validation, testing, and quality assurance (QA/UAT).
Ability to perform SQL queries and have knowledge of backend table structures.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills; ability to translate complex concepts into clear, concise business requirements.
Demonstrated ability to quickly learn and master complex processes and systems.
High commitment to customer service and strong work ethic.
Experience with Oracle EBS Finance modules (GL, AP, AR) is required.


-----------

37.
About Us
Zelis is modernizing the healthcare financial experience in the United States (U.S.) across payers, providers, and healthcare consumers. We serve more than 750 payers, including the top five national health plans, regional health plans, TPAs and millions of healthcare providers and consumers across our platform of solutions. Zelis sees across the system to identify, optimize, and solve problems holistically with technology built by healthcare experts – driving real, measurable results for clients.
Why We Do What We Do
In the U.S., consumers, payers, and providers face significant challenges throughout the healthcare financial journey. Zelis helps streamline the process by offering solutions that improve transparency, efficiency, and communication among all parties involved. By addressing the obstacles that patients face in accessing care, navigating the intricacies of insurance claims, and the logistical challenges healthcare providers encounter with processing payments, Zelis aims to create a more seamless and effective healthcare financial system.
Zelis India plays a crucial role in this mission by supporting various initiatives that enhance the healthcare financial experience. The local team contributes to the development and implementation of innovative solutions, ensuring that technology and processes are optimized for efficiency and effectiveness. Beyond operational expertise, Zelis India cultivates a collaborative work culture, leadership development, and global exposure, creating a dynamic environment for professional growth. With hybrid work flexibility, comprehensive healthcare benefits, financial wellness programs, and cultural celebrations, we foster a holistic workplace experience. Additionally, the team plays a vital role in maintaining high standards of service delivery and contributes to Zelis’ award-winning culture.
Position Overview
The AI Business Analyst bridges business intent with AI execution across the enterprise.
This role drives use case discovery, ROI articulation, solution shaping, and adoption enablement. Partner with US matrix leaders, Product teams, and Engineering to ensure alignment with enterprise roadmaps.
Key Responsibilities

Use Case Discovery & Roadmap alignment
Partner with business units, corporate functions, and operations to identify high-impact AI opportunities.
Lead discovery workshops, map current workflows, and identify AI/automation potential.
Translate business intent into structured requirements aligned to the 3 I’s (Intent Intelligence Infrastructure).
Shape problem statements, business rules, data dependencies, and measurable KPIs.
Solution Design & Prototyping
Collaborate with AI Engineers to refine prompts, workflows, and agentic logic.
Define user journey, integration touchpoints, and stakeholder roles.
Support quick prototypes to validate feasibility and refine requirements iteratively.
Enterprise Enablement & AI Literacy
Help partner teams adopt and scale AI tools (ChatGPT Enterprise, Copilot, Bedrock-based apps).
Support creation of playbooks, training assets, and self-service documentation.
Work with Grads and citizen developers to scale AI adoption in a governed model.
ROI Modelling & Impact measurement
Track adoption, productivity savings, error reduction, risk mitigation, and efficiency improvements.
Maintain dashboards for initiative progress, value capture, and enterprise expansion.
Qualifications
3–6 years as a Business Analyst or Product Analyst.
Strong understanding of AI/GenAI concepts, LLM capabilities, and prompt engineering basics.
Excellent requirements clarity, documentation skills, and stakeholder engagement.
Strong knowledge / applied understanding of healthcare claims processing, payments, pricing, provider networks.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience delivering automation or AI projects end-to-end.
Familiarity with COTS systems (Salesforce, Workday, ServiceNow, Onbase, Jira) and integration patterns.
Exposure to AI evaluation, safety, or governance principles.
Commitment to Diversity, Equity, Inclusion, and Belonging
At Zelis, we champion diversity, equity, inclusion, and belonging in all aspects of our operations. We embrace the power of diversity and create an environment where people can bring their authentic and best selves to work. We know that a sense of belonging is key not only to your success at Zelis, but also to your ability to bring your best each day.

Equal Employment Opportunity
Zelis is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.

------------------

38. Responsibilities

Collaborate with stakeholders to understand the business requirements for projects, enhancements, and processes.

Create BRD, FRD, SRS documents.

Create Research documents.

Conduct comprehensive market analysis, analyzing product lines, the competitive landscape, and the overall profitability of the business.

Engage in specialized research to uncover industry trends, benchmarking data, and understand complex business challenges to inform strategic decisions.

Prepare, review, and document requirements, specifications, business processes, and recommendations related to proposed solutions, incorporating insights from research findings.

Develop functional specifications and system design specifications for client engagements, informed by thorough research and analysis.

Lead ongoing reviews of business processes and develop optimization strategies, supported by research evidence.

Stay up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems, applying research methodologies to validate and recommend solutions.

Conduct meetings and presentations to share ideas, findings, and research insights with both technical and non-technical stakeholders.

Do unit acceptance testing of the product.

Excellent analytical, organizational, problem-solving, and research skills.

Exceptional verbal, written, and presentation skills, with the ability to communicate complex research findings clearly and effectively.

A solid understanding of business practices, with a keen interest in pursuing complex research questions to resolve business challenges.


-----------

39. 
The purpose of this role is to enable and support project delivery through the capture and analysis of user and business needs, ensuring project outcomes are aligned with the service vision and business strategy.
Job Description:
Key responsibilities: • Analysis and Requirements Definition. Employs a range of tools and techniques to gather business and user requirements against the clear objectives articulated for the project. Determines the need and value of performing the activity based on the context. If required, employs a range of tools and techniques to map 'As-Is' and To-Be' business processes/capabilities • Impact Analysis and Estimation. Identifies potential consequences of a change and estimates what needs to be modified to accomplish that change and focuses on defining changes within the scope of the overall project design, to the requisite quality with appropriate level of effort required depending on change defining • Business Solution Design and Development. Engages with requisite stakeholders to ensure business systems, workflows and processes contribute to target operating model/capability. Ensures that activities within project are mapped to ensure that they are delivered effectively and work in partnership with domain experts e.g. Enterprise Architects, Systems Analysts, where applicable, to translate business needs into solutions, work with technical leads to ensure business needs are translated into the technical solutions • Benefits Evaluation. Evaluates strengths and weaknesses of identified benefits and dis-benefits in line with project mandate • Stakeholder Engagement. Engages with business owners, business change managers, users and other identified key stakeholders, as required, to ensure alignment of project requirements and solution/capability design • Business Change. Works closely with Business Change Managers and improvement teams with identification of BAU enhancements and associated solutions to ensure that defined project outputs are delivered and benefits realised • Frameworks, Tools and Documentation. Provides advice and guidance to the project team on application of methodologies; operating model; functional specification; user cases; user stories; defect analysis; forms and templates appropriate for organisational context and project
Location:
India - Remote
Brand:
Bcoe
Time Type:
Full time
Contract Type:
Permanent

-----

40. 
About Tidal Commerce Inc.

Tidal is an outcome-focused, specialized eCommerce consulting and engineering boutique for B2C & B2B businesses, offering comprehensive solutions from ideation to implementation and management.

Recognized as a Shopify Plus partner.
Expertise in headless and composable technologies.
Diverse B2C and B2B planning and implementation experience and a deep understanding of both markets.
Integrated onshore and offshore teams in six countries, offering support for round-the-clock productivity.
Member of Umbrella-Incorporated, a business consulting firm, Tidal provides holistic end-to-end digital transformation solutions with cross-functional expertise in strategy, finance, operations, marketing and technology.

About the role

We are looking for a skilled Business Analyst with strong eCommerce expertise to join our team on a part-time basis. The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience with Commercetools, a solid understanding of subscription models (e.g., Zuora), and a proven track record of supporting scalable eCommerce solutions. You will work closely with cross-functional teams, translating business needs into actionable technical requirements and ensuring successful project delivery.

What you'll do

Gather, analyze, and document business requirements for eCommerce platforms, subscription models, and related integrations.
Translate business needs into functional specifications, user stories, and workflows for development teams.
Collaborate with stakeholders to design scalable eCommerce and subscription solutions using Commercetools and Zuora.
Identify gaps, challenges, and opportunities in current business processes and propose improvements.
Support solution design by providing detailed analysis of eCommerce features, product catalogs, pricing, and subscription workflows.
Participate in project planning, testing, and user acceptance, ensuring deliverables meet business and technical requirements.
Act as a liaison between business stakeholders, product owners, and technical teams to ensure clear communication and alignment.
Stay up-to-date with eCommerce and subscription management best practices and emerging trends.
Who you are:

Minimum of 5 years of experience as a Business Analyst with a focus on eCommerce solutions.
Hands-on experience with Commercetools and familiarity with subscription platforms such as Zuora.
Strong understanding of eCommerce processes including product catalog management, pricing, promotions, and order/subscription workflows.
Experience creating functional specifications, user stories, process flows, and use cases.
Strong analytical, problem-solving, and documentation skills.
Excellent communication and stakeholder management skills, able to bridge business and technical teams.
Ability to thrive in fast-paced, evolving environments and manage multiple priorities.
What We Offer:

Opportunity to work with a talented and passionate team.
Continuous learning and professional development opportunities.
Collaborative and innovative work environment.
Flexible work arrangements

--------

41. 
Key Responsibilities

Serve as the operational anchor forGoogle CloudRaMP(Rapid Migration Program) assessments, supporting end-to-end coordination across Cloud, Network, Security, Data, and App Modernization tracks.
Collect,validate, and structure customer environment data (infrastructure, workloads, applications, network, IAM, databases)requiredforRaMPassessment readiness.
Facilitate execution ofRaMPchecklists, maturity scoring models, discovery questionnaires, and evidence collectionby working closely with SMEs.
Analyze customer environments againstGCP best practices, Google Cloud Adoption Framework, andRaMPassessment criteriatoidentifygaps, risks, and modernization opportunities.
Support the creation and refinement ofassessment artifactsincluding discovery summaries, gap analysis reports, migration blockers, TCO insights, and modernization recommendations drafted by architects and SMEs.
Drive consistent documentation and tracking ofassessment progress, dependencies, risks, and customer action itemsusing Google tooling.
Translate technical findings from architects/SMEs intobusiness-friendly insights, decision matrices, and prioritization frameworks.
Prepareweekly dashboards, heatmaps, and progress scorecardsaligned withRaMPreporting requirements.
Assist TPM and Pod Leads with client presentations, executive summaries, andRaMPstage-gate submissions.
Ensure compliance withRaMPmethodology, assessment templates, and audit requirementsacross all assessment tracks.

Required Skills & Qualifications




About Virtusa

Teamwork, quality of life, professional and personal development: values that Virtusa is proud to embody. When you join us, you join a team of 27,000 people globally that cares about your growth — one that seeks to provide you with exciting projects, opportunities and work with state of the art technologies throughout your career with us.

Great minds, great potential: it all comes together at Virtusa. We value collaboration and the team environment of our company, and seek to provide great minds with a dynamic place to nurture new ideas and foster excellence.

Virtusa was founded on principles of equal opportunity for all, and so does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.


------

42.
Job Purpose

The Business Analyst is responsible for understanding, analyzing, and clearly documenting

business requirements and processes. The role involves initiating, discovering, defining, and shaping solutions across projects and products. The Business Analyst works closely with stakeholders, project teams, and product teams to interpret business needs, analyze data, and deliver insights that support informed decision-making and measurable business value.

Key Responsibilities

Requirements Gathering &amp; Analysis

 Engage with stakeholders to gather, analyze, and document business, functional, and non-functional requirements.

 Conduct workshops, JAD/RAD sessions, interviews, and surveys to elicit requirements.

 Prioritize requirements and translate business needs into clear specifications, user stories,

and acceptance criteria.

Business Process Analysis &amp; Modelling

 Analyse existing business processes and systems to identify gaps, risks, and improvement

opportunities.

 Develop process maps, flowcharts, use cases, process diagram and business process

models using appropriate techniques and tools.

 Document task analysis and process models to support solution design and optimization.

Documentation

 Prepare and maintain Business Requirement Documents (BRD), Functional &amp;

Nonfunctional Requirement Documents (FRD), use cases, and related artifacts.

 Ensure accuracy, consistency, and traceability of requirements throughout the project

lifecycle.

Stakeholder &amp; Relationship Management

 Act as a liaison between business users, IT teams, and project stakeholders.

 Build and maintain strong professional relationships to ensure clear communication and

alignment with business goals.

Project &amp; Agile Support

 Collaborate with project and product management teams on feasibility studies, solution

design, and business justification.

 Support Agile/Scrum delivery through backlog refinement, sprint planning, user

story creation and estimation.

 Help remove blockers and facilitate timely business and technical decisions.

Testing, Change &amp; Risk Management

 Support User Acceptance Testing (UAT) to ensure solutions meet business requirements.

 Identify business risks and issues, assess impacts, and support mitigation planning.

 Assist in change management activities, including user support and transition to new

processes.

Technical &amp; Functional Skills

 Strong knowledge of requirements engineering, structured analysis, and business analysis techniques.

 Familiarity with databases, SQL, and data analytics tools is an advantage.

 Experience working in Agile/Scrum environments.

Tools &amp; Technologies

 Proficiency in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint).

 Hands-on experience with tools such as JIRA, Confluence, Visio, or similar project and

documentation tools.

 Exposure to business intelligence tools like Power BI or Tableau is a plus.

Soft Skills

 Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

 Strong analytical, problem-solving, and critical-thinking abilities.

 High attention to detail with strong documentation skills.

 Ability to manage priorities, work independently, and demonstrate resilience in a fast-

paced environment.

 Strong planning, organizational, and stakeholder management skills.


---------

43.

Location:

Visakhapatnam Andhra Pradesh India
We are seeking a skilled and detail-oriented Business Analyst to join our team. In this role, you will connect business goals with technical solutions to enhance our processes, products, and services. You’ll gather and analyze data, define clear
requirements, and work closely with teams to deliver successful project outcomes.


Key
Responsibilities:

Collaborate with stakeholders to understand business needs, objectives, and challenges.
Gather, document, and analyze requirements to create detailed project specifications.
Identify opportunities for process improvements and recommend solutions.
Work closely with technical teams to ensure requirements are translated into functional designs.
Develop user stories, use cases, and process flow diagrams to guide development efforts.
Conduct gap analyses to determine areas where business processes can be optimized.
Assist in the testing and validation of solutions to ensure they meet business needs.
Provide regular updates and reports to stakeholders on project progress and outcomes.
Conduct training and create documentation to support the implementation of new processes or systems.
Stay updated on industry trends and emerging technologies to recommend innovative solutions.

---------------

44. 
Location

Kolkata (with frequent travel and client locations in India and abroad)

Experience

0 - 5 years (Fresh graduates with strong analytical aptitude are encouraged to apply)

Role Overview

We are looking for a Junior Business Analyst to work closely with the Project Lead on multiple analytics, operations, and strategy-focused projects, primarily in the Earth Science Industry.

This role involves hands-on data work, documentation, client interaction, and frequent site travel. The ideal candidate is curious, structured in thinking, comfortable with numbers and presentations, and hunger to learn and grow, working directly on real-world projects.

Key Responsibilities

1. Data Analysis & Reporting

Work extensively on Excel, SQL, a bit of Python for data cleaning, analysis, and basic modeling
Preparation of dashboards, MIS reports, and performance trackers
Assist in deriving findings and insights from operational, production, and process data
2. Documentation & Business Analysis

Prepare and maintain:
Requirement documents, Gap Analysis
Process flows and SOPs
Meeting notes, MOMs, and project documentation
Assist in problem statement definition, gap analysis, and solution structuring
3. Client & Site Engagement

Visits to project sites and client locations
Support client discussions, workshops, and data collection exercises
Coordinate with client teams and internal stakeholders
4. Presentations & Communication

Create clear, structured PowerPoint presentations for clients and management
Help convert complex data and ideas into simple, visual stories
Support proposal preparation and project updates
5. Project Support

Assist in:
Project scoping and effort estimation
Solution design and implementation support
Tracking project progress and action items
Required Skills & Qualifications

Technical / Analytical Skills

Strong working knowledge of MS Excel and Google Sheets (formulas, pivot tables, basic analysis)
Good command over PowerPoint for professional presentations
Strong logical thinking, reasoning, and structured problem-solving ability
Ability to understand processes and break problems into clear components
Soft Skills

Good verbal and written communication skills
Client-facing mindset and professional etiquette
Willingness to ask questions, learn, and take ownership
Ability to work in dynamic environments, including field locations
Other Requirements

Willingness to travel extensively, including:
Including remote mine sites
Different cities and countries (as required by projects)
Comfortable working in industrial and field environments along with in-office work.
Flexible, proactive, and open to hands-on learning
Education

Bachelor’s degree in engineering, Mining, Mineral Processing, Commerce, Management, Economics, Statistics, Analytics, or a related field
Strong academic or project background in data, analytics, or operations is a plus
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent

Pay: ₹300,000.00 - ₹500,000.00 per year

Benefits:

Provident Fund
Work Location: In person

---------------

45.
Role Overview

We are seeking a high-level Business Analyst who specializes in the intersection of Digital Lead Campaigns and Sales Strategy. The ideal candidate will have a "deep-reading" ability to look at campaign data and identify exactly why leads are or are not converting into sales.

Crucially, this person must be able to categorize our B2B portfolio: identifying which partners provide "automatic" recurring business through system-driven flows, and which B2B leads require high-touch focus from our sales team to close. You will be the master of our data, using Advanced Excel to build the reporting infrastructure that drives our business decisions.

Key Responsibilities

Campaign Observation: Deeply analyze Digital Lead Campaigns (Meta, Google, LinkedIn, etc.) to evaluate lead quality vs. lead quantity.
Strategic Reporting: Use Advanced Excel to create automated dashboards that track "Lead-to-Cash" journeys, allowing management to see the real ROI of every marketing dollar.
Sales Strategy Development: Identify high-performing lead segments and recommend changes to the sales script or follow-up timing to increase conversion rates.
Data Integrity: Audit lead flow from the digital campaign source into the CRM to ensure no data is lost or misattributed.
Gap Analysis: Observe and report on discrepancies between campaign spend and actual sales revenue, providing "why" explanations rather than just "what" numbers.
Technical Skills Required

Digital Lead Campaigns: Deep understanding of campaign metrics (CTR, CPL, CPC, and Conversion Rate). You must understand how digital funnels are structured.
Advanced Excel (Expert Level): * Automation: Mastery of Power Query and Macros to handle large datasets.
Complex Formulas: Expert use of XLOOKUP, OFFSET, INDIRECT, and nested IFS.
Modeling: Ability to build "What-If" analysis models to predict how changing a campaign budget will impact sales.
Data Visualization: Ability to build "Slicers" and dynamic charts in Excel that allow the sales team to filter data by campaign, date, or region.
Behavioral Competencies

Critical Observation: The ability to spot a trend in a report before it becomes a problem.
Strategic Thinking: You don't just report that "leads are down"; you suggest a new strategy to fix it.
Technical Translator: You can explain technical digital campaign results to a sales team in a way they understand.
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent

Pay: ₹13,718.10 - ₹67,899.83 per month

Benefits:

Cell phone reimbursement
Provident Fund
Work Location: In person

--------------------
46.
Job Title: Business Analyst Intern
Company: Optimspace.in
Location: Remote
Duration: 3 months
Opportunity: Full-time based on performance, with a Certificate of Internship

About Optimspace.in

Optimspace.in offers practical experience for students and graduates in Data and Business analysis to enhance career prospects and provide hands-on experience in analyzing processes, identifying business needs, and recommending data-backed solutions.

Responsibilities

Gather and analyze business and market data
Create dashboards and reports using Excel, Power BI, or similar tools
Identify business trends, patterns, and insights
Support strategic decision-making through data analysis
Document findings and suggest process improvements
Work collaboratively with cross-functional teams
Requirements

Pursuing or recently completed a degree in Business, Economics, Data Science, or related field
Proficient in Excel and data visualization tools (Power BI/Tableau)
Familiar with SQL and basic data analytics concepts
Strong communication and critical thinking skills
Interest in solving business problems using data-driven approaches
Benefits

Stipend: ₹7,500 - ₹15,000 (Performance-Based)
Real-world data analysis experience.
Certificate of Internship and Letter of Recommendation.
Build your portfolio with impactful projects.


------
47.
Job Description:
We are seeking a dynamic and detail-oriented Business Analyst to join our team. The ideal candidate should possess strong analytical skills, a keen understanding of business processes, and the ability to bridge the gap between business needs and technology solutions.

Experience:
Education:
Years of Experience: 2~4 years
Additional Experience: Experience in data analysis and reporting.

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with stakeholders to gather, analyze, and document business requirements.
Conduct thorough data analysis to understand trends, identify opportunities, and support decision-making processes.
Develop detailed business process models, use cases, and user stories.
Work closely with cross-functional teams to ensure alignment between business objectives and technical solutions.
Conduct stakeholder interviews and workshops to elicit and prioritize requirements.
Assist in the development of project plans, timelines, and deliverables.
Provide support during the implementation phase, ensuring that solutions meet business requirements.

Skills and Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Finance, Computer Science, or related field.
Proven experience as a Business Analyst in a technology-driven environment.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills.
Ability to translate business requirements into technical specifications.
Familiarity with Agile or Scrum methodologies is a plus.
Proficiency in business analysis tools and techniques.

Benefits:
Competitive salary and benefits package.
Opportunities for professional development and training.
Collaborative and inclusive work environment.

--------

48.
Job Description
About Turing:

Turing is one of the world's fastest-growing AI companies accelerating the advancement and deployment of powerful AI systems.

Turing helps customers in two ways: Working with the world's leading AI labs to advance frontier model capabilities in thinking, reasoning, coding, agentic behavior, multimodality, multilinguality, STEM and frontier knowledge; and leveraging that work to build real-world AI systems that solve mission-critical priorities for companies.

Role Overview:

In this role, you will be working on projects to help fine-tune large language models (like ChatGPT) using your strong analytical and English comprehension skills. The ideal candidate should have the ability to read, summarize, and break down large content into smaller logical blocks, conduct research online, validate claims made in content through online research, and work with the LLM (Large Language Models) to solve puzzles! The projects will also help you learn how to leverage AI to be a better analyst. This is your chance to future-proof your career in an AI-first world!

Your role is critical in helping fine-tune and improve large language models (like gpt), and will make you an expert on how to leverage AI to be a better analyst. This is your chance to future-proof your career in an AI-first world!

What does day-to-day look like:

You would spend time answering a variety of interesting analytical questions and creating scenarios that can train the LLM models to get better. Here are a couple of examples that models might get wrong, and You would articulate the correct answer & explanation to enable the models to learn:
Based on a given distribution of sales by month across locations, could you analyze which location has grown the most (Hint: what time period should we look at should we account for sudden variability at the beginning)
In a small town, there are four distinct neighborhoods: Oak, Pine, Maple, and Elm. A postman is assigned to deliver mail and can only deliver to two neighborhoods in one day, with certain rules (e.g. Oak is always visited before Pine). If he delivers to Oak and Elm on the first day, which neighborhoods does the carrier deliver to on the second day
Note: No other prior specialized domain experience is needed.

Requirements:

English Proficiency: Ability to read and write in English with a high degree of comprehension skills.
Analytical Skills: Good research and analytical skills
Feedback Skills: Ability to provide constructive feedback and detailed annotations.
Creative Thinking: Creative and lateral thinking abilities.
Communication: Excellent communication and collaboration skills.
Independence: Self-motivated and able to work independently in a remote setting.
Technical Setup: Desktop/Laptop set up with a good internet connection.
Preferred Qualifications:

Bachelors degree or undergraduate in Engineering, Literature, Journalism, Communications, Arts, Statistics, or a related field. We are open to candidates who do not have a Bachelor's degree but have experience in the area.
Experience writing professionally (business analysts, research analyst, copywriter, journalist, technical writer, editor, translator, etc.)
Understanding of Excel and Google Suite.
Proficiency in Data interpretation, Logical reasoning and Basic arithmetic is preferred.
Perks of Freelancing With Turing:

Work in a fully remote environment.
Opportunity to work on cutting-edge AI projects with leading LLM companies.
Potential for contract extension based on performance and project needs

-----------

49.
Job Description
Responsibilities:

Maintain the integrity of Sales territory s records, working with sales managers and sales reps to ensure correct assignments.
Maintain territory data and Oracle Sales Cloud, Sales Dashboards.
Running reports for sales intelligence and forecasting by building analysis in Oracle Business Intelligence
Be a member of the Oracle University Business Intelligence Super user community, Review collected data for accuracy, and present findings to the Operations Manager
Delivery of On Boarding training for new Sales Members, on operations procedures and systems to ensure Sales member spends less time in processes with maximum time to customer
Handle or escalate issues and queries connected to the data collection and processing process, quickly, accurately and professionally.
Develop and maintain good working relationships with internal support groups (back office Operations teams etc), to ensure data processing is managed in a timely and accurate manner.
Manage and respond to queries and questions related to Sales Cloud, Quoting Tools, Approvals and process, in a timely and professional manner.
Update and maintain Operations internal websites and portal.
Operate in line with Oracle and OU business policies and procedures, ensuring sales adherence to business practices.
Maintain documentation of the processes related to Sales transactions.
Profile:

Experience in Essential functions 3-5 years
Highly computer literate - Essential
Excellent English verbal and written communication skills Essential
Advanced MS Excel skills Essential
Experience in building analysis and dashboards in Oracle Business Intelligence (OBI EE) Good to have
Knowledge of SQL and experience of running SQL queries in Oracle SQL developer Requirement
Experience in using Oracle Sales Cloud (Fusion CRM) Good to have
Accuracy and attention to detail
Excellent planning, Organising and Presentation skills, ability to prioritize workload
Team player
Personal drive
Professional attitude

-------

50.

Job Description
Key ACCOUNTABILITIES

Provide improvement suggestions to the top management to identify and run improvement initiatives that support strategy deployment, focusing on process improvement and digitalization.
Become a go-to person for advice on improvement around processes and digitalization and establish and coordinate global best practice sharing, set up communities, and develop training materials.
Manage and steer multiple projects along the entire project life-cycle. (E.g. strategy implementation, improvement & transformation initiatives, focusing on process improvement and digitalization).
Reviews future project requirements and develops strategies for future work.
Derive actionable ideas, prioritize, and translate them into projects in alignment with key stakeholders.
Support the Leadership team in identifying and evaluating digital use cases.
Work with business analysts to prepare proposals and supporting documents for tender/bid submissions.
Organize and architect content/features/functionality for new and existing websites and applications.
Review effort estimation and user stories for the projects;
Work closely with key stakeholders to communicate design/product and project strategy.
Determine the best testing approach and partner with the QA team to support the testing of functionality of the projects to meet evolving client requirements.
Supervise the business team including the UI/UX team to achieve their performance goals
Capture business, functional requirements, Nonfunctional requirements and supervise technical staff to create and deliver solutions.
Determine the root cause of the business problem
Responsible for creating artifacts like User Stories, BRS, SRS, FRS, user manuals, RTM, etc. documents according to organizational policy.
Possess up-to-date knowledge about stakeholder management.
Conduct UAT, provide end-user training, and confirm post-implementation support for the live operation.
Maintaining of SDLC process based on different development methodologies
*Must have experience working in Passenger Service Systems (PSS) like Amadeus Alta or SabreSonic or SITA Horizon Project.

Required EXPERTISE AND COMPETENCIES

A. TECHNICAL

Bachelor of Science (BSc)/MSc in Computer Science & Engineering or BBA
At least 5+ years experience is preferred
Certification in Business Analysis/ ECBA/ CSPO will be preferred.
Spotlight
Joining goodies, Gifts on festivals, Maternity leaves, Paternity leaves, Annual leaves, Rewards &amp; recognition
Education
Bachelor Of Technology (B.Tech/B.E), Masters in Technology (M.Tech/M.E), Master in Computer Application (M.C.A), Bachelor Of Computer Application (B.C.A), Post Graduate Diploma in Computer Applications (PGDCA)

----------

51.
Job description
• Level of Experience: 3+ Years
• Job Type: Full Time
• Location: Kolkata
• Vacancies: 1

Responsibilities:
• Assist in analyzing business requirements and translating them into functional solutions that align with company goals.
• Work closely with stakeholders, product managers, and developers to gather, document, and refine business and system requirements.
• Contribute to the development of process flows, wireframes, and business models to improve operational efficiency and user experience.
• Participate in data analysis, user research, and feedback sessions to identify areas for improvement and optimize business processes.
• Continuously enhance analytical and problem-solving skills through mentorship, feedback, and hands-on project involvement.
• Stay updated on industry trends, business analysis methodologies, and emerging technologies to drive innovation and process improvements.

Requirements And Qualifications:
• 3+ years of experience in business analysis, with a focus on gathering requirements and improving business processes.
• Proficiency in business analysis tools like JIRA, Confluence, Microsoft Visio, and a basic understanding of data modeling, process mapping, and workflow optimization.
• Experience in gathering, documenting, and analyzing business and system requirements to support decision-making and project execution.
• Ability to collaborate with stakeholders, product managers, and development teams to ensure seamless communication and project alignment.
• Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail, along with the ability to adapt to evolving business needs.
• Eagerness to learn, receive feedback, and grow within a team environment, with a passion for business process improvements and emerging industry trends.

Why Join Us?
• Enjoy recognition from the joining date, and welcome to be a part of our efficient team.
• Enjoy five days working from Monday-Friday with flexible 9 hours working with a 1-hour break.
• You can balance between work and personal life.
• Supportive management team who can help you reach success.
• Get learning and achieving opportunities.
• Get opportunities to work with great clients.
• Best-in-class facilities and modern infrastructure.
• Grab the chance to work with the award-winning company.
• Attractive perks and benefits with competitive salary packages.
• Enjoying work here with fun activities and teamwork.

Perks & Benefits

We provide a range of learning opportunities and a flexible work schedule. Join us and thrive in your career scope!

Competitive Salary

Earn deserving salary packages. Our company values your skills and rewards you for your hard work.

Career Growth

Unlock your skills and grab the endless career growth opportunities. We are ready to help you climb the ladder of success with comprehensive guidance.

Exciting Projects

Get inspired by challenging projects and be part of the creativity for fruitful results.

Health Insurance

Enjoy your family's comprehensive health insurance coverage, and take care of your health.

Flexible Working Hours

Balance your professional and personal life with our flexible working hours. Boost productivity that fits your lifestyle.

Paid Holidays

Boost up your body and mind by taking petite breaks from work. Enjoy well-deserved leaves and breaks for relaxation.

Paid Training Programs

Develop your skills with our paid training programs. Learn and grow in a continuous process in your career.

Support

Work in a supportive environment where you can learn and succeed in your career.

------------

52.
Job description
About the job:

About Turing:

Turing is one of the worlds fastest-growing AI companies accelerating the advancement and deployment of powerful AI systems.

Turing helps customers in two ways: Working with the worlds leading AI labs to advance frontier model capabilities in thinking, reasoning, coding, agentic behavior, multimodality, multilinguality, STEM and frontier knowledge; and leveraging that work to build real-world AI systems that solve mission-critical priorities for companies.

Role Overview:

In this role, you will be working on projects to help fine-tune large language models (like ChatGPT) using your strong analytical and English comprehension skills. The ideal candidate should have the ability to read, summarize, and break down large content into smaller logical blocks, conduct research online, validate claims made in content through online research, and work with the LLM (Large Language Models) to solve puzzles! The projects will also help you learn how to leverage AI to be a better analyst. This is your chance to future-proof your career in an AI-first world!

Your role is critical in helping fine-tune and improve large language models (like gpt), and will make you an expert on how to leverage AI to be a better analyst. This is your chance to future-proof your career in an AI-first world!

What does day-to-day look like:
• You would spend time answering a variety of interesting analytical questions and creating scenarios that can train the LLM models to get better. Here are a couple of examples that models might get wrong, and You would articulate the correct answer & explanation to enable the models to learn:
• Based on a given distribution of sales by month across locations, could you analyze which location has grown the most? (Hint: what time period should we look at? should we account for sudden variability at the beginning?)
• In a small town, there are four distinct neighborhoods: Oak, Pine, Maple, and Elm. A postman is assigned to deliver mail and can only deliver to two neighborhoods in one day, with certain rules (e.g. Oak is always visited before Pine). If he delivers to Oak and Elm on the first day, which neighborhoods does the carrier deliver to on the second day?

Note: No other prior specialized domain experience is needed.

Requirements:
• English Proficiency: Ability to read and write in English with a high degree of comprehension skills.
• Analytical Skills: Good research and analytical skills
• Feedback Skills: Ability to provide constructive feedback and detailed annotations.
• Creative Thinking: Creative and lateral thinking abilities.
• Communication: Excellent communication and collaboration skills.
• Independence: Self-motivated and able to work independently in a remote setting.
• Technical Setup: Desktop/Laptop set up with a good internet connection.

Preferred Qualifications:
• Bachelors degree or undergraduate in Engineering, Literature, Journalism, Communications, Arts, Statistics, or a related field. We are open to candidates who do not have a Bachelor's degree but have experience in the area.
• Experience writing professionally (business analysts, research analyst, copywriter, journalist, technical writer, editor, translator, etc.)
• Understanding of Excel and Google Suite.
• Proficiency in Data interpretation, Logical reasoning and Basic arithmetic is preferred.

Perks of Freelancing With Turing:
• Work in a fully remote environment.
• Opportunity to work on cutting-edge AI projects with leading LLM companies.
• Potential for contract extension based on performance and project needs.

After applying, you will receive an email with a login link. Please use that link to access the portal and complete your profile.

Know amazing talent? Refer them at turing.com/referrals, and earn money from your network.

Who can apply:

Only those candidates can apply who:

Salary:
Competitive salary
--------------

53.

Job description
Responsibilities:
• Maintain the integrity of Sales territory s records, working with sales managers and sales reps to ensure correct assignments.
• Maintain territory data and Oracle Sales Cloud, Sales Dashboards.
• Running reports for sales intelligence and forecasting by building analysis in Oracle Business Intelligence
• Be a member of the Oracle University Business Intelligence Super user community, Review collected data for accuracy, and present findings to the Operations Manager
• Delivery of On Boarding training for new Sales Members, on operations procedures and systems to ensure Sales member spends less time in processes with maximum time to customer
• Handle or escalate issues and queries connected to the data collection and processing process, quickly, accurately and professionally.
• Develop and maintain good working relationships with internal support groups (back office Operations teams etc), to ensure data processing is managed in a timely and accurate manner.
• Manage and respond to queries and questions related to Sales Cloud, Quoting Tools, Approvals and process, in a timely and professional manner.
• Update and maintain Operations internal websites and portal.
• Operate in line with Oracle and OU business policies and procedures, ensuring sales adherence to business practices.
• Maintain documentation of the processes related to Sales transactions.

Profile:
• Experience in Essential functions 3-5 years
• Highly computer literate - Essential
• Excellent English verbal and written communication skills Essential
• Advanced MS Excel skills Essential
• Experience in building analysis and dashboards in Oracle Business Intelligence (OBI EE) Good to have
• Knowledge of SQL and experience of running SQL queries in Oracle SQL developer Requirement
• Experience in using Oracle Sales Cloud (Fusion CRM) Good to have
• Accuracy and attention to detail
• Excellent planning, Organising and Presentation skills, ability to prioritize workload
• Team player
• Personal drive
• Professional attitude

---

54.
Job description
You will be a Jr. Business Analyst at SVF Entertainment, a leading Media and Entertainment company in East India with 8 National Awards. Your role will involve analyzing data related to music labels, social media insights, and other relevant information to provide actionable insights supporting campaigns and strategies.

Key Responsibilities:
- Analyze music label performance, social media insights, and other data to facilitate decision-making.
- Maintain and update dashboards for social media and streaming platforms ensuring accurate reporting.
- Develop clear, data-driven presentations and communicate findings to stakeholders.
- Troubleshoot metadata issues to ensure accuracy of music tracks across platforms.
- Monitor social media trends, engagement, and content performance, and provide optimization recommendations.
- Collaborate with cross-functional teams to align on data-driven objectives.
- Utilize AI tools for task automation and enhanced data insights.

Key Skills & Qualifications:
- Education: Bachelor's degree in business, Data Analytics, or a related field.
- Experience: 2+ years in business analysis, preferably in music & entertainment, or related industries.
- Technical Skills:
- Proficiency in Excel and AI tools.
- Familiarity with metadata standards for music platforms and social media analytics tools (e.g., Facebook Insights, YouTube Analytics).
- Soft Skills: Strong organizational, communication, and problem-solving abilities.


----

55.
Job description
Review Criteria
• Strong Business Analyst Profile
• Total 4+ YOE, of which 2+ Business Analysis
• Must have expertise in Workflows, API documentation and UI/UX specifications
• Must have experience with API integrations and troubleshooting and conducting UATs
• Must have working knowledge of RDBMS and basic SQL and Excel
• Must be a commerce graduate
• Any company (Preferred B2B SaaS (RetailTech, ERP, OMS, POS, E-commerce SaaS, Logistics)
• Candidate must be based in Kolkata, or a native of Kolkata or nearby states, (Bihar/ Jharkhand) and wanting to relocate back

Preferred
• Proficiency in using tools such as Jira, Confluence, Lucidchart, and Visily.
• Experience in Order Management System or POS product

Job Specific Criteria
• CV Attachment is mandatory
• Which product line you have worked on (ERP, POS, OMS, other SaaS, e-commerce)?
• Reason for job change?
• What's your under-graduation degree (BE / Btech / Bcom / BBA)

Role & Responsibilities

We are looking for a Business Analyst who will be the vital link between our information technology capacity and our business objectives by supporting and ensuring the successful completion of analysis, testing and release to production tasks of our software product’s features.
• Converting business problems into functional requirements (User stories, API Documentation, UI/UX, workflow, scenarios).
• Troubleshoot problems encountered in integration by understanding the API response - relating to the functional understanding.
• Interacting with the solution architect in supporting to architect the solution.
• Coordinating with the development team on a day-to-day basis to develop the specifications into the product solution.
• Conduct user acceptance test to ensure requirement fulfilment.
• At times he/she would also have to interact with the clients to clarify requirements.
• Conduct training and provide documentation to share the knowledge of newly developed features.
• Provide support on gaps (if any) on the developed features.
• Exposure on product management as client requirements backlog/ ideas needs to be managed. A good exposure for aspiring product managers.
• Use world’s most famous SDLC tools like Jira, Confluence, Lucidchart, Visily.

Ideal Candidate
• 4-7 Years experience required.
• Excellent analytical aptitude and problem-solving abilities.
• Process mapping - understanding of tools like Lucidchart.
• Very Methodical.
• Understanding of API Integrations.
• Understanding of RDMS - Basic SQL.
• Deep understanding of the omni retail or e-commerce or POS.
• Basic/Advance - Excel.
• Good communication, Documentation and presentation skills.
• Commerce or BTech background.


-----------


56.
Job description
About the Role:

We're hiring LeadBusiness Analysts to manage and mentor a team of analysts creating business-focused content to improve AI models. You'll combine leadership, quality oversight, and subject expertise in MBA-relevant domains to ensure outputs are accurate, logically sound, and aligned with project goals. This role is ideal for someone who enjoys people management, operational excellence, and shaping high-quality analytical content. No prior AI experience is required for this role.

What You'll Do:
• Lead and mentor a team of Business Analysts/Content Specialists.
• Allocate tasks, oversee workflows, and ensure timely, high-quality delivery.
• Conduct QA reviews, refine processes, and improve team efficiency.
• Provide performance feedback, training, and career development.
• Act as the primary stakeholder contact, sharing regular project updates.
• Guide creation of case studies, scenarios, and structured business content (finance, policy, e-commerce, etc.).

What We're Looking For:
• 2+ years of team management experience.
• 36 years in business analysis, consulting, content, or domain-focused projects.
• Strong analytical, logical, and communication skills.
• Proficiency in structured file formats (TSV, JSON, HTML, XML, Markdown).
• No prior AI experience is required
• Bonus: prior work on LLM performance data, case study writing, or academic/research content.
• Full-time commitment (40 hrs/week); immediate joiners preferred.

Why Join Us:
• Competitive pay and flexible remote work.
• Lead a team working on cutting-edge AI projects.
• Exposure to advanced LLMs and how they're trained.
• Freelance perks: autonomy, flexibility, and global collaboration.
• Potential for contract extension.

Offer Details:
• Commitments Required: 40 hours per week with 4 hours of overlap with PST.
• Engagement type: Contractor assignment/freelancer (no medical/paid leave)
• Duration: 1 month.

About Turing:

Turing, based in San Francisco, is the world's leading research accelerator for frontier AI labs and a trusted partner for global enterprises. We advance cutting-edge research with high-quality data, training pipelines, and top AI talent across coding, reasoning, STEM, multilinguality, multimodality, and agents. We also help enterprises turn AI from proof-of-concept into proprietary systems that deliver reliable performance, measurable impact, and real results on the P&L.

After applying, you will receive an email with a login link. Please use that link to access the portal and complete your profile.

Know amazing talent Refer them at turing.com/referrals, and earn money from your network.


------------

57.
Job description
Job Description: Senior Business Analyst

Experience: 5+ years

Work Mode: Full Time

Type: On-site

Requirements:
• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/ Information technology/ Business Administration or similar in related field.
• Collaborate with customers to gather and document detailed business requirements.
• Prepare and process invoices related to project milestones.
• Address client inquiries and provide timely solutions.
• Oversee the delivery process and facilitate User Acceptance Testing (UAT) with customers.
• Follow up with clients to ensure prompt payment.
• Prepare comprehensive project documentation, including requirement specifications, project plans, and status reports.
• Develop Data Flow Diagrams (DFD) and Entity-Relationship Diagrams (ERD) to represent system data flow and database structures.
• Develop detailed use cases and user stories to capture and communicate functional requirements.

·

Skills:
• Requirement gathering and analysis
• Project coordination and management
• Client relationship management
• Billing and financial follow-ups
• UAT and delivery management
• Installation support and coordination
• Documentation and reporting
• DFD and ERD modelling
• Use case and user story preparation

Job Types: Full-time, Permanent

Benefits:
• Health insurance
• Provident Fund

---------

58.
Job description
This is a full-time on-site role for a Business Analyst/Product Owner located in the Kolkata metropolitan area. The Business Analyst/Product Owner will be responsible for analyzing business requirements, defining product vision, and managing product backlog. This role will involve working closely with stakeholders to prioritize product features and ensure successful project delivery.

Collaborate with stakeholders to understand their needs and gather detailed business requirements.
• Develop and document business process models to illustrate current and future states.
• Ability to work from scratch (Product development)
• Work with IT and other departments to implement solutions and ensure they align with business goals.
• Work closely with product management to align on vision, program backlogs and product roadmap
• Interview users, stakeholders, build epics & product backlog.
• Drive UX design thinking. prioritize the backlogs with conflicting business priorities
• Understand feasibility, dependencies and technical challenges in ReSTful API’s, ReactJS, ReactNative, Java Springboot, Docker, Kubernetes, Kafka, material design, Code setups branching & code merge on git, AWS, mongo DB vs relational or other DB’s, Data, impact of architectural changes, etc. Proficiency in data analysis tools and techniques.
• Experience with business process modeling and documentation tools.
• Knowledge of project management methodologies and tools.

Guided by a philosophy to produce safe and sustainable ---, it is a pioneer in quality --- products, operating with cutting-edge technology in order to meet the stringent requirements of its reputed customers both in India and abroad.

Operating for over six decades and now an INR 25 billion group, we have emerged as a large, growing, competitive, and multi-product --- organization by delivering quality material through innovation, excellence, and dedication.

----

59.
Job description
Job role: Business Analyst

Exp: 4-5 years

Location: Kolkata

Are you a BA ready to revolutionize banking operations with intelligent automation? Join a high-impact team driving digital transformation through innovative UiPath solutions.

What You'll Do :

As a Business Analyst you'll be at the heart of our automation journey from process discovery and documentation to solution deployment and optimization. This role is ideal for someone who thrives in a collaborative environment, blending business insight with technical excellence.

Key Responsibilities :

- Lead the identification, documentation, and analysis of automation opportunities

- Create detailed PDDs/SDDs and work closely with developers to ensure accurate implementation

- Collaborate with cross-functional teams to bridge business needs with UiPath solutions

- Support the development and deployment of workflows using UiPath Studio, Orchestrator, and AI Center

- Monitor and optimize performance of deployed automations

- Provide expertise on best practices and scalability of automation

Skills & Experience :

- Proven experience with UiPath Studio, Orchestrator, and AI Center

- Strong knowledge of process documentation and business process mapping (PDDs/SDDs)

- Excellent communication skills and an analytical mindset

- Prior experience in banking operations is a strong plus

- Familiarity with intelligent automation trends and tools

Why Join Us?

- Be part of a transformative initiative in the banking sector

- Work with cutting-edge automation tools

- Take ownership of projects and drive real business impact

- A culture of innovation, collaboration, and growth

This is more than just a roleits your opportunity to make automation smarter, scalable, and future-ready.

----

60.
Job description
Description:

Objectives of the Role:

- Enable MDs office in strategic planning, reviews and execution alignment.

- Drive business analytics and insights across sales, operations, finance and manufacturing.

- Strengthen cross-functional collaboration by ensuring accountability and timely delivery of projects.

- Serve as a trusted advisor and problem solver, bringing clarity and solutions to complex challenges.

- Enhance organizational agility by acting as a bridge between strategy and execution.

Key Responsibilities:

1. Strategic Business Support:

- Work with the MD and leadership team on strategy formulation, Annual Operating Plans (AOP), and key functional reviews.

- Prepare market research, competitor intelligence, business models and performance dashboards.

- Analyse business problems and propose data-driven solutions for improved outcomes.

2. Performance Tracking & Business Reviews:

- Drive dashboards, trackers, and business MIS across functionssales, finance, operationsfor clarity and accountability.

- Support MD in strategy development, AOP, business reviews, strategic insights and ad-hoc SBU assessments.

- Support monthly/quarterly business reviews with structured MIS and insights.

- Collaborate with HODs to monitor initiatives and escalate risks proactively.

3. Project Management & Execution Oversight:

- Lead cross-functional projects as the MDs execution armbridging execution with strategy for plants, sales zones, supply chain & corporate functions

- Track progress, surface risks/opportunities and ensure closure through structured follow-ups.

- Support special initiatives and transformation programs on behalf of MD.

4. Operational Insight & Ground-Level Execution:

- Conduct on-ground visits (plants & distribution markets) to validate execution and gather insights.

- Identify gaps between strategy and execution, accordingly, work with respective teams to close them, in a timely manner.

- Act as an independent reviewer to ensure alignment of execution with strategy.




----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 1 : 

- Candidate must have minimum 1+ year rich experience in new client acquisition, procurement and business development activities.
- Strong knowledge in pre-sales and post-sales activities.
- Should be good in lead generation and getting the key contact details of clients.
- Must have the ability to generate potential leads and to identify potential customers.
- Ability to make 100 calls per day.
- Responsible for the entire tie up process from the beginning to end.
- Skills: Lead Generation, Prospect Research, Contact Identification, Sales Outreach and Follow-Ups, Objection Handling, Business Development, Opportunity Identification.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 2 : 

What you will do:
Continuous research and understanding of prospective and current clients' business and industry. You will perform competitor benchmarking in terms of practices, processes, and policies.
You are expected to understand business processes, evaluate them, and identify areas of improvements.
Create data automations and validations using Excel and Google Sheets.

Associated Skills:
Market Research, Industry Scanning, Competitor Review, Data Analysis, KPI Definition and Tracking, MS Office Suite, Spreadsheet-Based Analysis, Client Advisory, Root Cause Identification.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 3 : 

- Analyze and interpret data to inform decision-making processes in business transformation projects.
- Proficient in developing project plans, managing timelines, and ensuring the delivery of consulting services.
- Strong understanding of change management principles to facilitate successful implementation of initiatives.
- Experience in stakeholder engagement to effectively gather requirements and align project objectives.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Change Enablement Support, Project Management, Task Tracking, Timeline Awareness, Stakeholder Management, Expectation Alignment.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 4 : 

- Demonstrated ability to analyze and interpret data to inform decision-making processes.
- Proficient in developing project plans, managing timelines, and ensuring delivery.
- Leverage industry best practices to drive continuous improvement and optimize consulting outcomes.
- Capable of engaging stakeholders to gather requirements effectively.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Change Enablement Support, Project Management, Work Progress Monitoring, Client Advisory, Recommendation Explanation, Data Analysis, Performance Analysis.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 5 : 

Responsibilities:

Lead opportunity assessment, solution design and proposals to build a value proposition for the clients leveraging our services.
Independently manage assignments in strategy assessment, finance performance management, and process improvement.
Develop transformation frameworks to help enable effective process transformation exercises.
Focused on generating data driven analysis and insights to support hypothesis for value realization assignments.

Skills Required:
Client Advisory, Structured Thinking, Option Evaluation, Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Pre-Sales Support, Proposal Contribution, Data Analysis, Variance Analysis.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 6 : 

- Understanding the requirements of the Clients based on Sales Team inputs.
- Coordinating with clients for proper documentation.
- Forwarding expectations of Clients to the operational team to deliver them in time.
- Support the operations team with the feedback from the Client.
- Acting as a supporting bridge between the Clients and the Legal team.

Skills:
Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Stakeholder Management, Internal Coordination, Issue Escalation, Reporting and Documentation, Version Control Discipline.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 7 : 

What you will do:
Provide business analysis and troubleshooting in all phases of the project. Assume hands-on project implementation duties including initiate, design, build, test, and deploy.
Gather and document business requirements, configuration designs, and test plans. Support the deliverables of Technical Consultants by providing functional guidance.

Associated Skills:
Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Problem Clarification, Project Management, Delivery Follow-Ups, Reporting and Documentation, Document Structuring, Operations Support, Execution Assistance.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 8 : 

- Assume hands-on Center of Excellence (COE) duties for Treasury Products.
- Provide business analysis and troubleshooting to ensure the solution meets client needs.
- Gather and document business requirements, configuration designs, and test plans.
- Attend product trainings to gain knowledge of system functionality and architecture.
- Perform minor configuration of the system.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Recommendation Explanation, Operations Support, Process Understanding, Reporting and Documentation, Insight Summarization, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 9 : 

- Meet or exceed corporate quarterly growth goals.
- Build a regional sales strategy and structure to drive corporate growth.
- Develop Account Development and Management Plans for the territory.
- Prepare Sales Reports, Analyzing Sales Volume, Potential Sales And Customer Base Expectations.
- Develop Long Term Relationships With Customers.

Skills:
Business Development, Opportunity Identification, Account Expansion Support, Pipeline Awareness, Data Analysis, Performance Analysis, Trend Identification, Market Research, Opportunity Identification.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 10 : 

Role Overview:
Engage with partners and understand their offerings, map their cross-functional organizations and understand about their business goals.
Define and execute business plans including thought-leadership and joint assets.
Map plans to increase penetration in specific industry verticals and drive focused initiatives.
Co-sell and drive joint targeted engagements between partners and enterprise teams.

Skills:
Business Development, Account Expansion Support, Opportunity Identification, Market Research, Industry Scanning, Stakeholder Management, Internal Coordination, Pre-Sales Support, Pitch Preparation Support.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 11 : 

- Drive consultative sales for company formation and licensing.
- Manage qualified leads from multiple channels (calls, emails, CRM).
- Conduct deep discovery calls to understand client requirements.
- Close deals, coordinate documentation, and ensure smooth onboarding.
- Maintain updated records of all interactions in CRM.

Skills:
CRM Management, Salesforce, Zoho CRM, Sales Process Tracking, Funnel Monitoring, Sales Outreach and Follow-Ups, Appointment Booking, Negotiation Support, Closure Support, Client Advisory.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 12 : 

- Collaborate with stakeholders to understand business requirements and translate them into functional specifications.
- Drive system enhancement initiatives and process improvement within Talent Effectiveness programs.
- Support end-user training, change management, and post-implementation follow-ups.
- Ensure consistent communication and alignment with all internal stakeholders.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Change Enablement Support, Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Project Management, Dependency Awareness, Data Analysis, Insight Extraction for Decision-Making.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 13 : 

Responsibilities

Determine operational objectives by studying businesses and technical functions; gathering information.
Prepare reports by collecting, analyzing and summarizing information and trends.
Create informative, actionable and repeatable reporting that highlights relevant business trends and opportunities for improvement.
Conduct insightful, ad hoc analyses to investigate ongoing or one-time operational issues.

Skills:
Data Analysis, KPI Definition and Tracking, Trend Identification, Variance Analysis, Reporting and Documentation, Status Report Preparation, MS Office Suite, Spreadsheet-Based Analysis, Market Research.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 14 : 

- Must be passionate about sales.
- Should be ready to work in field, must have good command over language.
- Pro-active approach to meet potential customers, flexible on work timings.

Skills:
Sales Outreach and Follow-Ups, Outreach Messaging, Appointment Booking, Follow-Up Discipline, Lead Generation, Prospect Research, Contact Identification, Business Development, Opportunity Identification.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 15 : 

- Basic exposure to e-business industry.
- Experience managing and tracking leads.
- Knowledge of software development principles and practices.
- Ability to work well in high paced environment.
- Ability to shift priorities quickly and easily.

Skills:
Lead Generation, Lead Prioritization, Database Maintenance, CRM Management, Lead Lifecycle Handling, Funnel Monitoring, Stakeholder Management, Internal Coordination, MS Office Suite, Spreadsheet-Based Analysis.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 16 : 

- Develop and execute strategies to achieve stage wise deliverables of the program across states.
- Coordinating with central and field team members to achieve deliverables.
- Engage with representatives of Implementing Agencies (IAs).
- Facilitate partnerships with input and output companies to build a sustainable business model.

Skills:
Project Management, Task Tracking, Timeline Awareness, Delivery Follow-Ups, Stakeholder Management, Expectation Alignment, Operations Support, Coordination with Operations Teams, Reporting and Documentation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 17 : 

What you'll do:
Engage with healthcare clients to understand their business challenges and translate them into data engineering opportunities.
Define solution architectures and data strategies for use cases.
Work with cross-functional data teams to design and implement robust data pipelines.
Support the design of scalable data models.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Problem Clarification, Root Cause Identification, Value Communication, Pre-Sales Support, Solution Explanation, Data Analysis, Business Metric Interpretation, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 18 : 

- Translate business strategy and customer needs into a clear product roadmap.
- Interact with business users, clients, and SMEs for gathering requirements.
- Document user stories along with acceptance tests.
- Combine feedback gathered from stakeholders to build and manage the backlog.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Problem Clarification, Project Management, Dependency Awareness, Work Progress Monitoring, Reporting and Documentation, Document Structuring, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 19 : 

- Provide business analysis and troubleshooting in all phases of the project.
- Assume hands-on project implementation duties (initiate, design, build, test, deploy).
- Gather and document business requirements, configuration designs, and test plans.
- Gain industry and functional expertise through client projects and training.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Root Cause Identification, Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Project Management, Delivery Follow-Ups, Reporting and Documentation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 20 : 

- Provide business consultancy services to clients.
- Develop and implement business strategies and plans.
- Monitor and report on business performance metrics.
- Collaborate with clients to understand their needs and provide tailored solutions.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Structured Thinking, Recommendation Explanation, Value Communication, Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Data Analysis, KPI Definition and Tracking, Reporting and Documentation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 21 : 

Responsibilities:
Develop and implement effective business strategies to drive growth and improvement.
Conduct market research and analyze industry trends to identify opportunities and challenges.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to develop and launch new products and services.
Identify and mitigate risks to ensure the success of projects and initiatives.

Skills:
Market Research, Industry Scanning, Competitor Review, Opportunity Identification, Business Development, Account Expansion Support, Business Transformation Support, Stakeholder Management, Internal Coordination.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 22 : 

- Undertake short-term or long-term projects to address a variety of issues and needs.
- Meet with management or appropriate staff to understand their requirements.
- Use interviews and surveys to collect necessary data.
- Conduct situational and data analysis to identify and understand a problem or issue.
- Formulate plans to implement recommendations.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Problem Clarification, Root Cause Identification, Structured Thinking, Data Analysis, Insight Extraction for Decision-Making, Reporting and Documentation, Insight Summarization, Project Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 23 : 

- Conduct in-depth analysis of clients business operations, processes, and performance metrics.
- Identify areas for improvement and develop customized recommendations and solutions.
- Collaborate with clients to implement and execute strategies for business improvement.
- Monitor and evaluate the impact of implemented changes and make adjustments as needed.

Skills:
Data Analysis, Performance Analysis, Variance Analysis, Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Adoption Monitoring, Client Advisory, Recommendation Explanation, Operations Support.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 24 : 

- Work with field PreSales globally to support ongoing Sales pursuit.
- Build out business workflows for prospective demos leveraging solution capabilities.
- Translate industry use cases into user driven workflows.
- Communicate business cases regarding customer specific needs related to product functionality.

Skills:
Pre-Sales Support, Requirement Translation, Solution Explanation, Pitch Preparation Support, Scope Clarification, Client Advisory, Value Communication, Business Development, Operations Support.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 25 : 

What you will do:
Help clients transform their businesses and align strategy with market shifts.
Help clients understand the impact of leading technologies on business processes.
Identify best practices, analyze performance gaps, and develop comprehensive transformation recommendations.
Project business value of solutions in client-relevant terms.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Change Enablement Support, Client Advisory, Structured Thinking, Option Evaluation, Value Communication, Data Analysis, Gap Analysis, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 26 : 

- Lead business consulting engagements specializing in manufacturing operations.
- Facilitate client workshops to conduct process discovery, identify transformation opportunities, and design future-state processes.
- Formulate and execute Go-To-Market strategies to expand business opportunities.
- Assist leadership team with client pursuits by conducting market research.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Structured Thinking, Project Management, Timeline Awareness, Delivery Follow-Ups, Market Research, Industry Scanning, Business Development, Opportunity Identification.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 27 : 

- Partner with internal business stakeholders to understand needs.
- Shape complex infrastructure demands.
- Act as a trusted advisor and technical evangelist.
- Proactively identify, qualify, and shape complex demand opportunities.
- Develop and manage the complex demand pipeline across business functions.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Option Evaluation, Trade-Off Assessment, Project Management, Pipeline Awareness, Dependency Awareness, Stakeholder Management, Internal Coordination, Issue Escalation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 28 : 

Responsibilities:
Lead support functions or operations for multiple business groups and contribute to large scale strategic initiatives.
Research moderately complex business, operational, and strategic initiatives.
Assist in the planning and execution of a variety of programs and initiatives.
Provide leadership in management of relationships and implementation of programs.

Skills:
Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Project Management, Task Tracking, Timeline Awareness, Data Analysis, Insight Extraction for Decision-Making, Stakeholder Management, Internal Coordination.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 29 : 

- Participate in a variety of assigned and ongoing business operations to ensure success.
- Identify opportunities for process improvement by conducting root cause testing of all metrics.
- Review and research strategies and action plans to establish effective processes.
- Present recommendations to develop, implement, and monitor strategic approaches.

Skills:
Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Data Analysis, KPI Definition and Tracking, Client Advisory, Root Cause Identification, Problem Clarification, Reporting and Documentation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 30 : 

- Drive sales and business growth for software solutions.
- Build strong relationships with government departments, infrastructure companies, and consultants.
- Conduct market research to identify new opportunities, client segments, and project leads.
- Collaborate with technical teams to prepare proposals, demonstrations, and presentations.

Skills:
Business Development, Opportunity Identification, Pipeline Awareness, Revenue Tracking Assistance, Lead Generation, Prospect Research, Pre-Sales Support, Pitch Preparation Support, Market Research.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 31 : 

- Work on diverse, challenging projects helping to design and implement insightful solutions.
- Gain hands-on experience and learn from industry experts.
- Demonstrate strong logical reasoning skills.
- Proficiency in coding languages and database knowledge.

Skills:
Data Analysis, Data Validation, Insight Extraction for Decision-Making, MS Office Suite, Spreadsheet-Based Analysis, Reporting and Documentation, Document Structuring, Version Control Discipline.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 32 : 

- Analyze different pharmaceutical/life sciences data sets like claims data and sales data.
- Communicate results to clients and onshore team members.
- Understanding business objectives and developing models that help to achieve them.
- Verifying data quality, and ensuring it via data cleaning.

Skills:
Data Analysis, KPI Definition and Tracking, Trend Identification, Variance Analysis, Insight Extraction, MS Office Suite, Spreadsheet-Based Analysis, Reporting and Documentation, Client Advisory.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 33 : 

- Set up, configure, and deploy Amazon Connect instances.
- Diagnose and resolve complex technical issues in Amazon Connect environments.
- Apply DevOps methodologies including IaC and automated deployments.
- Collaborate with sales and engineering teams to design and deliver solutions.

Skills:
Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Project Management, Dependency Awareness, Client Advisory, Problem Clarification, Root Cause Identification, Reporting and Documentation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 34 : 

- Conduct extensive field visits and Focus Group Discussions.
- Provide real-time feedback on on-ground developments.
- Assist in data collection, manual data entry, and cleaning tasks.
- Facilitate contact-building for Assembly In-Charges.

Skills:
Market Research, Industry Scanning, Secondary Data Interpretation, Data Analysis, Data Validation, Insight Extraction for Decision-Making, Stakeholder Management, Client Communication, Reporting and Documentation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 35 : 

- Experience in digital communication and digital marketing.
- Passion for all forms of digitized communication and design.
- Collaborate with the team on various projects.

Skills:
Marketing and Demand Support, Campaign Awareness, Lead Source Understanding, Coordination with Marketing Teams, MS Office Suite, Slide Creation, Document Formatting, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 36 : 

- Collaborate with cross-functional teams to deliver high-quality solutions.
- Develop and implement process improvements to increase efficiency and productivity.
- Analyze complex problems and develop innovative solutions.
- Build strong relationships with clients and stakeholders.

Skills:
Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Client Advisory, Problem Clarification, Root Cause Identification, Project Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 37 : 

- Collaborate with clients to understand their business needs and develop effective solutions.
- Conduct research and analysis to identify trends and opportunities for improvement.
- Develop and present reports and presentations to clients.
- Identify and mitigate risks associated with client projects.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Problem Clarification, Market Research, Industry Scanning, Reporting and Documentation, Insight Summarization, Status Report Preparation, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 38 : 

- Attending daily rounds and deliveries.
- Following the Plan for the day.
- Admission and Discharge summaries to be prepared.
- Clear Documentation and Communication.
- To perform procedures under supervision/independently.

Skills:
Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Reporting and Documentation, Status Report Preparation, Document Structuring, Stakeholder Management, Client Communication, Internal Coordination.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 39 : 

Responsibilities:

Lead and execute strategic initiatives to drive business growth, profitability, and operational efficiency.
Analyze market trends, competitor activities, and industry best practices to identify business opportunities.
Develop actionable strategies for business transformation and market positioning.
Manage and oversee the execution of strategic projects, ensuring timely delivery.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Change Enablement Support, Client Advisory, Structured Thinking, Recommendation Explanation, Market Research, Industry Scanning, Project Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 40 : 

- Develop and manage marketing campaigns for demand generation.
- Support Go to Market plans.
- Plan and execute various lead generation programs with committed targets.
- Develop and manage marketing collateral including newsletters and case studies.

Skills:
Marketing and Demand Support, Campaign Awareness, Lead Source Understanding, Funnel Stage Familiarity, Lead Generation, Lead Prioritization, Database Maintenance, Business Development, Opportunity Identification, Reporting and Documentation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 41 : 

- Undertake short-term or long-term projects to address a variety of issues and needs.
- Meet with management to understand their requirements.
- Conduct situational and data analysis to identify and understand a problem.
- Present and explain findings to appropriate executives.
- Provide advice or suggestions for improvement.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Problem Clarification, Root Cause Identification, Recommendation Explanation, Data Analysis, Insight Extraction for Decision-Making, Reporting and Documentation, Insight Summarization, Project Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 42 : 

- Support development and execution of the mid to long-term distribution execution strategy.
- Collect voice of the customer and voice of the business to propose ideas for growth.
- Gather information and assess the market including competitive issues.
- Apply decision-making and critical thinking tools.

Skills:
Business Development, Opportunity Identification, Account Expansion Support, Market Research, Market Overview Preparation, Secondary Data Interpretation, Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Value Communication, Data Analysis.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 43 : 

Responsibilities:
Delivering Organization-Level Strategy or Entity-Level Strategy.
Defining the Operating Model and Performance Management.
Strategic Planning, Commercial Due Diligence, and Investment Strategy.
Go-To-Market (GTM) Strategy, Growth Plans, and Expansion Plans.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Change Enablement Support, Market Research, Market Overview Preparation, Opportunity Identification, Client Advisory, Structured Thinking, Data Analysis.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 44 : 

- Analyze business practices, goals, and workflows to put together directional strategies.
- Explore a diverse range of financial and operational models.
- Polish design thinking by taking a hands-on approach while dealing with hurdles.
- Manage project teams and lead them with utmost diligence.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Client Advisory, Root Cause Identification, Structured Thinking, Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Data Analysis.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 45 : 

What you'll do:
Define transformation strategies, create target state blueprints, and design roadmaps across infrastructure.
Facilitate workshops, map customer journeys, and develop user-centric solutions.
Apply experience in large deal management to craft winning propositions.
Act as a trusted advisor to business and technology leaders.

Skills:
Pre-Sales Support, Solution Explanation, Proposal Contribution, Pitch Preparation Support, Client Advisory, Structured Thinking, Value Communication, Business Transformation Support, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 46 : 

- Generate leads through outbound calls, CRM data, and market research.
- Conduct cold calls to understand client needs and pitch services.
- Support pre-sales activities including requirement discovery and proposal drafting.
- Maintain client and opportunity data in CRM tools.

Skills:
Lead Generation, Prospect Research, Contact Identification, Lead Prioritization, Sales Outreach and Follow-Ups, Outreach Messaging, Objection Handling, CRM Management, Sales Process Tracking, Pre-Sales Support.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 47 : 

- Analyze business processes and identify improvement opportunities.
- Support business transformation initiatives through structured analysis.
- Coordinate project activities and track timelines with internal teams.
- Prepare executive-level reports and presentations.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Change Enablement Support, Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Reporting and Documentation, Status Report Preparation, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 48 : 

- Analyze business data using Excel and SQL.
- Generate insights and KPIs to support consulting recommendations.
- Perform data validation and reporting for client engagements.
- Prepare dashboards, reports, and presentations for stakeholders.

Skills:
Data Analysis, KPI Definition and Tracking, Performance Analysis, Trend Identification, Data Validation, MS Office Suite, Spreadsheet-Based Analysis, Reporting and Documentation, Client Advisory.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 49 : 

- Gather and understand client requirements during pre-sales discussions.
- Support solution positioning and proposal preparation.
- Draft proposals using presentation and documentation tools.
- Support negotiations and deal finalization.

Skills:
Pre-Sales Support, Requirement Translation, Solution Explanation, Proposal Contribution, Pitch Preparation Support, Negotiation Support, Commercial Term Clarification, Closure Support, Client Advisory, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 50 : 

- Coordinate operational activities across teams.
- Track tasks and timelines using project management tools.
- Support execution of consulting deliverables.
- Communicate regularly with clients to gather feedback.

Skills:
Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Coordination with Operations Teams, Project Management, Task Tracking, Timeline Awareness, Dependency Awareness, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 51 : 

- Perform lead generation through outbound calls and market research.
- Make cold calls to pitch services and schedule meetings.
- Update leads and opportunities in CRM systems.
- Support pre-sales activities and proposal preparation.

Skills:
Lead Generation, Prospect Research, Contact Identification, Lead Prioritization, Sales Outreach and Follow-Ups, Outreach Messaging, Follow-Up Discipline, CRM Management, Sales Process Tracking, Pre-Sales Support.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 52 : 

- Conduct client discussions to understand business requirements.
- Analyze business problems and structure solutions.
- Present recommendations to client stakeholders.
- Support implementation and execution tracking.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Requirement Understanding, Problem Clarification, Structured Thinking, Recommendation Explanation, Stakeholder Management, Client Communication, Expectation Alignment, Reporting and Documentation, Project Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 53 : 

- Conduct market and industry research.
- Perform competitor benchmarking and analysis.
- Support strategic decision-making with research insights.
- Prepare research summaries and presentations.

Skills:
Market Research, Industry Scanning, Competitor Review, Market Overview Preparation, Secondary Data Interpretation, Reporting and Documentation, Insight Summarization, Data Analysis, Insight Extraction for Decision-Making.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 54 : 

- Participate in pre-sales discussions with clients.
- Understand client requirements and scope.
- Support proposal drafting and commercial documentation.
- Assist sales teams during negotiations.

Skills:
Pre-Sales Support, Requirement Translation, Solution Explanation, Proposal Contribution, Scope Clarification, Negotiation Support, Commercial Term Clarification, Pricing Discussion Assistance, Client Advisory.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 55 : 

- Analyze business practices, goals, and workflows to put together directional strategies.
- Explore a diverse range of financial and operational models.
- Polish design thinking by taking a hands-on approach while dealing with hurdles.
- Manage project teams and lead them with utmost diligence.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Client Advisory, Root Cause Identification, Structured Thinking, Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Data Analysis.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 56 : 

- Understand lead sources from digital marketing campaigns.
- Coordinate with marketing teams on lead quality.
- Support sales teams with campaign insights.

Skills:
Marketing and Demand Support, Campaign Awareness, Lead Source Understanding, Funnel Stage Familiarity, Coordination with Marketing Teams, Lead Generation, Lead Prioritization, Market Research, Opportunity Identification.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 57 : 

- Assess existing business processes.
- Support improvement planning initiatives.
- Coordinate execution of transformation actions.
- Track progress and outcomes.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Change Enablement Support, Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Project Management, Work Progress Monitoring.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 58 : 

- Undertake short-term or long-term projects to address a variety of issues and needs.
- Conduct situational and data analysis to identify and understand a problem or issue.
- Present and explain findings to appropriate executives.
- Formulate plans to implement recommendations.

Skills:
Client Advisory, Problem Clarification, Root Cause Identification, Recommendation Explanation, Data Analysis, Insight Extraction for Decision-Making, Reporting and Documentation, Insight Summarization, Project Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 59 : 

- Meet or exceed corporate quarterly growth goals.
- Build a regional sales strategy and structure.
- Prepare Sales Reports, Analyzing Sales Volume.
- Develop Account Development and Management Plans.

Skills:
Business Development, Opportunity Identification, Pipeline Awareness, Revenue Tracking Assistance, Data Analysis, Performance Analysis, Trend Identification, Market Research, Market Overview Preparation, Reporting and Documentation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job description 60 : 

- Assess existing business processes.
- Support improvement planning initiatives.
- Coordinate execution of transformation actions.
- Track progress and outcomes.

Skills:
Business Transformation Support, Process Improvement Assistance, Change Enablement Support, Operations Support, Process Understanding, Execution Assistance, Project Management, Work Progress Monitoring.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
